SPYWARE 

S.  HRG.  109–1090 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

MAY  11,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

61–887 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on May 11, 2005 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Allen  .....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Burns  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Boxer  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Bill Nelson  ...........................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Snowe  ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Moll, C. David, Chief Executive Officer, Webroot Software, Inc. 

Hughes, J. Trevor, Executive Director, Network Advertising Initiative  .............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
........................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Schwartz,  Ari,  Associate  Director,  Center  for  Democracy  and  Technology 
(CDT)  .....................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Wyden, Hon. Ron, U.S. Senator from Oregon, prepared statement  ....................

APPENDIX 

Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement  ...........
Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Daniel K. Inouye to: 

C. David Moll  ....................................................................................................
Ari Schwartz  .....................................................................................................

Page 
1 
3 
1 
5 
5 
2 
35 

9 
11 
14 
16 

19 
21 
7 

41 

41 
42 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SPYWARE 

WEDNESDAY,  MAY  11,  2005 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Conrad  Burns, 
presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. CONRAD BURNS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MONTANA 

Senator BURNS. We will call the Committee to order—I know the 
witching  hour  is  here.  I  would  like  to  get  started  on  time,  because 
we sure won’t make up any time later on during the day. I welcome 
everybody here today. 

We are here to discuss the growing problem with spyware. Even 
though Chairman Stevens can’t be here today, I’d like to thank him 
for  calling  this  hearing,  and  allowing  us  to  proceed  to  address  all 
the  challenges  that  we  face  in  the  computing  industry  today.  It’s 
my pleasure to be joined by our witnesses. Mr. Hughes of the Net-
work  Advertising  Initiative,  Mr.  Moll  with  Webroot  Software,  and 
Mr. Schwartz with the Center for Democracy and Technology. 

Over the past few years, we haven’t always been able to work in 
Congress  with  folks  like  yourselves  that  have  been  critical  to  our 
success  in  managing  the  booming  communications  infrastructure, 
so I thank you for your time, and for being here today. 

Spyware is an increasingly worrisome threat to our every day ac-
tivities  in  cyberspace.  Spyware  refers  to  software  which  secretly 
collects information about computer users and shares it with others 
over the Internet without those users’ knowledge or consent. 

This  sneaky  software  is  often  used  to  track  the  movements  of 
consumers  online  and  even  steal  passwords,  social  security  num-
bers, bank account information, and other highly sensitive personal 
data.  Spyware  can  also  be  used  to  turn  a  person’s  computer  into 
a  tool  that  participates  in  criminal  activity  directed  by  a  third 
party. 

The  problems  posed  by  spyware,  and  to  the  security  of  cyber-
space  in  general,  are  thus  real  and  they  are  urgent.  As  was  the 
case with spam several years ago, I believe the solution lies in the 
right  mix  of  technical  solutions  and  tougher  legislation.  Both  will 
be  necessary  to  make  a  meaningful  dent  in  the  quantity  and  the 
types  of  malicious  code  that  get  downloaded  into  the  private  com-
puters  of  businesses  and  citizens,  without  their  consent.  However, 
we also have to be careful not to throw out the baby with the bath- 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

water, by making many ordinary and positive types of online busi-
ness’ practices illegal. The area of adware in particular is an impor-
tant gray area to keep an eye on. How exactly are online advertise-
ments served up to the users, and what kind of consent is most ap-
propriate? Most adware models are good for cyberspace because it’s 
important  to  have  a  robust  and  responsive  advertising  component 
for  most  commercial  online  services.  I,  being  an  old  broadcaster, 
understand that. 

But  when  it  comes  to  installing  software  on  private  computers, 
we  have  to  make  sure  we  don’t  allow  some  of  the  more  unscrupu-
lous  players  out  there  to  spoil  the  field  for  all  the  good  actors  who 
are just trying to make cyber businesses more efficient. 

As  many  of  you  are  aware,  Senator  Wyden  and  I  have  been 
working  on  an  anti-spyware  bill  for  more  than  a  year  now,  in  fact 
2  years,  to  be  right  honest  with  you.  The  underlying  principle  of 
our legislation is that a person should have the right to know what 
is  happening  to  his  or  her  own  piece  of  property.  I  also  would  like 
to  thank  Representatives  Barton  and  Bono  for  their  continued  ef-
forts on this issue in the House of Representatives. Their approach 
is  similar  to  ours,  and  we  look  forward  to  working  together  with 
them  in  the  future.  The  Spy  Block  bill,  S.  687,  that  we  now  have 
in front of us includes a great deal of industry and consumer group 
input,  and  we  believe  it  to  be  a  major  step  toward  a  resolution  of 
the problem at hand. 

In  the  108th  Congress  a  similar  version  of  that  bill  was  marked 
up  out  of  this  committee  unanimously.  Given  the  combined  effort 
involved,  Senator  Wyden  and  I  truly  are  hopeful  that  we  can  do  it 
early  this  session.  We  also  have  the  input  of  Senator  Allen  and 
many  other  folks  who  are  deeply  interested  in  this  issue.  We  plan 
to work with everybody on this committee to get a product that we 
all can be proud of, but also a product that gets the job done. 

As  we  review  these  issues,  it’s  important  to  understand  that  a 
person’s  or  business’s  computer  should  be  viewed  as  private  prop-
erty  and  that  the  rightful  owner  should  be  able  to  control  access 
to it. In the same way that you should have the right to authorize 
access to your home for maintenance or upgrades, you should have 
the right to control who installs software on your computer. 

So, I thank you very much for coming today. And now I will call 

on Senator Smith from Oregon if he has a statement. 

STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator  SMITH.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  appreciate  your 
holding  this  hearing.  It’s  a  very  important  topic.  I  share  your  con-
cern on the issue. I have a keen interest in spyware, and have con-
tinued  to  work  on  these  issues  to  protect  consumers  and  busi-
nesses. 

I was stunned to learn that according to a survey by the National 
Cyber  Security  Alliance  and  America  Online,  80  percent  of  all 
home  computers  are  currently  infected  with  spyware.  Furthermore 
80 percent of the owners of infected computers are not aware their 
computers are, in fact, infected. Nonetheless consumers are clearly 
concerned  about  the  issue.  Consumers  have  downloaded  free 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

versions  of  two  of  the  most  widely  used  anti-spyware  programs 
over 45 million times. 

Although spyware has been used for many deceitful purposes, in-
cluding  theft  of  personal  information  from  infected  computers,  the 
technology behind it has been used toward legitimate ends, as well. 
The complete regulation of an entire category of technology or prod-
uct can have many unintended and serious consequences. 

If the definition of spyware becomes too wide, legislation adopted 
in  haste  might  not  take  into  account  the  evolution  of  future  tech-
nologies  and,  in  turn,  stifle  innovation.  I  believe  we  need  to  limit 
the  abuse  of  the  deceitful  practices  by  dishonest  users,  but  at  the 
same time, allow industry the ability to build on, and improve, ex-
isting  technologies.  I’m  aware  of  several  technologies  that  we 
learned  from  Mr.  Gates  the  other  day,  that  was  very  encouraging. 
To that end, I am working with Senator Allen to develop legislation 
that increases the FTC’s current authority to enforce existing laws 
and  allows  the  agency  to  also  coordinate  with  law  enforcement 
overseas, to prosecute deceptive online activities. 

We need to give the FTC the necessary tools to go after the indi-
viduals who are already violating current Federal law. I agree that 
we  do  need  to  address  the  most  egregious  activities  and  behaviors 
without  placing  unnecessary  restrictions  on  the  entire  technology 
industry.  I  also  believe  that  an  appropriate  balance  can  be  found 
between limiting the legitimate use of existing technologies, and al-
lowing  for  the  technology  industry  to  grow,  expand  and  innovate. 
As  we  continue  to  address  this  issue,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  look  for-
ward to working with you and all my colleagues on this committee 
to find the right balance in a timely manner. Thank you. 

Senator BURNS. Senator Allen? 

STATEMENT OF HON. GEORGE ALLEN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM VIRGINIA 

Senator  ALLEN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  I  thank  you  for 
calling  today’s  hearing,  and  thank  all  our  witnesses  for  appearing 
this morning as well. 

Since  the  last  time  the  Committee  considered  this  issue,  con-
sumer  complaints  and  concern  about  this  irritating,  volatile 
spyware  issue  has  increased,  with  only  a  few  consumers  figuring 
out  how  to  combat  it.  As  Senator  Smith  stated,  the  AOL  and  Na-
tional  Cyber  Security  Alliance,  in  October  of  2004—I  won’t  repeat 
his statistics—but the average computer had more than 90 spyware 
programs  on  it.  Dell  Computer  said  by  the  end  of  2003  they  re-
ported that spyware was the number one consumer complaint com-
ing  into  their  call  centers.  Most  alarming,  last  year  nearly  half  of 
online identity theft cases were caused or initiated by some sort of 
spyware program. 

All  of  us  can  agree  that  under  no  circumstances  is  it  acceptable 
to  deceptively  monitor  a  consumer’s  activities  online.  In  fact,  false 
and  misleading  practices  associated  with  spyware  threaten  con-
sumer  confidence  and  harm  the  Internet  as  a  viable  medium  for 
communications, and electronic commerce. In examining this offen-
sive  spyware  issue  which  causes  aggravation—it  insults  some  peo-
ple and some of the adware in particular—and additionally you get 
degraded computer performance. I believe we need to encourage, to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

the greatest extent possible, market-driven technology solutions, as 
well as strengthen the enforcement of existing Federal laws. 

Every  legitimate  business  associated  with  the  Internet,  in  my 
view,  has  an  interest  in  eliminating  spyware.  A  recent  FTC,  or 
Federal  Trade  Commission,  report  suggests  that  the  rapid  tech-
nology  advancements  being  made  to  combat  spyware  such  as  fire 
walls,  filters,  anti-spyware  tools,  improved  Internet  browsers,  and 
operating systems are constantly providing newer and more afford-
able  protections  to  consumers  whether  at  home,  or  at  the  place  of 
business.  The  Internet’s  viability  depends  on  consumers’  satisfac-
tion and consumers need to be made aware of these advancements, 
so they can be protected from harmful spyware applications. 

Because  the  fraudulent  and  deceptive  installation  of  spyware 
programs  is  presently  a  violation  of  Federal  law,  such  as  the  Fed-
eral  Trade  Commission  Act,  and  the  Computer  Fraud  and  Abuse 
Act, Congress must focus its efforts on adequate resources and pen-
alties  to  combat  the  problem.  Federal  officials  believe  they  already 
have  adequate  authority  under  existing  statutes  to  prosecute 
spyware  purveyors.  Law  enforcement  is  not  stymied  by  the  lack  of 
Federal  jurisdiction,  but  rather  from  the  lack  of  overall  resources. 
That’s  why  today  I’m  introducing  legislation  with  Senators  Smith 
and Ensign, which would provide Federal law enforcement officials 
with the resources and tools necessary to increase the breadth and 
strength  of  anti-spyware  enforcement  efforts.  Our  legislation 
strikes  the  careful  balance  of  pursuing  illegal,  wrongful  behavior, 
while  not  stifling  or  limiting  technology  innovation  or  legitimate 
online transactions. 

Specifically,  since  spyware  violators  are  not  limited  to  state  or 
national  borders  to  perpetrate  their  illegal  activity,  the  legislation 
will  set  a  national  standard  for  the  unfair  and  deceptive  practices 
associated  with  spyware.  Additionally,  our  legislation  will  provide 
the Federal Trade Commission with authority to share and coordi-
nate  information  with  foreign  law  enforcement  officials  to  improve 
their  ability  to  bring  cases  and  prosecute  international  spyware 
purveyors.  Last,  our  legislation  addresses  the  most  egregious  ac-
tivities  and  wrongful  behavior  conducted  via  spyware  by  signifi-
cantly  increasing  the  civil  and  criminal  penalties,  including 
disgorgement. In other words, get after the ill-gotten gains of these 
criminals. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  really  look  forward  to  hearing  our  witnesses 
opinions  on  such  an  approach,  and  as  I  indicated,  I  would  prefer 
a  market-driven  solution,  but  believe  Congress  can  take  an  active 
role, in aiding law enforcement officials and providing adequate re-
sources  to  combat  this  problem,  while  also  increasing  and  tough-
ening  the  penalties  against  such  illegal  activity.  I  would  actually 
like the disgorged profits, proceeds, these ill-gotten gains to be used 
to  actually  fund  further  prosecution  of  spyware  purveyors.  And  I 
look  forward  to  working  with  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Senator 
Burns,  because  you’ve  shown  great  leadership  on  this  effort,  and 
the  rest  of  the  Committee,  we  do  need  to  work  to  address  these 
concerns raised today. 

Thank you. 
Senator BURNS. Thank you very much. Mr. Nelson? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator  NELSON.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  am  delighted  to  be  a  co-spon-
sor,  along  with  you,  Senator  Wyden  who’s  sitting  right  out  there 
in  the  front  row,  and  Senator  Boxer  on  this  Spy  Block  Act,  it  is 
most,  most  important.  It’s  interesting  that  this  hearing  is  being 
held the day after we just had the hearing in this very same Com-
mittee  on  ID  theft.  And  all  of  this,  all  of  these  problems  are  con-
verging  at  once  because  of  the  advance  of  technology,  that  people 
are  stealing  our  identity,  people  are  intruding  into  our  computers, 
and  one  of  the  things  that’s  happening  in  that  intrusion  of  com-
puters,  be  it  by  phishing,  or  be  it  by  surreptitiously  putting  a  pro-
gram in, that they are starting to poison the minds of our children. 
When  suddenly  up  flashes  this  Internet  porn  site.  And  so,  this  is 
an extremely important hearing that we are having, the legislation 
that  we  filed  is  extremely  important.  Just  like  yesterday’s  hearing 
on what we are going to do about people stealing our identity. 

It’s  not  like  you  could  go  out  and  shred  anything  that  you  were 
throwing away, or put it in a burn bag, because all of this informa-
tion  is  in  cyberspace  now.  And  the  sophisticated  thieves  pene-
trating that can virtually take over our identity, and that’s the sub-
ject of this hearing, they can absolutely penetrate into the most pri-
vate  domain  that  we  have,  which  is  our  home,  and  suddenly  im-
plant stuff that we don’t wish to have implanted. And so I am real-
ly looking forward to this hearing. 

Senator  BURNS.  Thank  you  very  much.  There’s  an  old  farming 
term about that. It is the harvest by unscrupulous folks. And that’s 
what we have here. Senator Boxer? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BARBARA BOXER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM CALIFORNIA 

Senator BOXER. Thank you so much. 
I want to also welcome Senator Wyden who I see there. We miss 
you  on  this  committee,  but  we  know  your  interest  remains.  I’m 
very happy to see you here. 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing.  I  was  proud 
to join with you and Senator Wyden in reintroducing the Spy Block 
Act,  which  I  now  am  happy  to  know  that  Senator  Nelson  is  a 
strong  advocate  of.  Our  legislation  is  designed  to  address  increas-
ing  concerns  that  I  have  heard  coming  from  California,  and  other 
states, about spyware. These insidious programs install themselves 
on computers without the users giving permission or even knowing 
about it. 

It’s  hard  to  use  analogies  with  this,  but  it  is  sort  of  like  some-
body  walking  around  your  house  invisibly.  You  think  you  can  use 
your  computer  to  read  whatever  you  want  to  read,  whatever  you 
want to access, you access. But with spyware someone is out there 
gathering  personal  information—your  passwords,  your  e-mail  ad-
dress—and  sending  it  over  the  Internet  to  anyone  they  want,  in-
cluding  maybe  criminals.  They  can  monitor  the  sites  a  computer 
user visits and send targeted pop-up ads, such as that described by 
my colleague, Senator Nelson. They can change a computer’s home 
page  setting,  to  that  of  the  spyware’s  choice,  or  they  can  redirect 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

a  user’s  Internet  browser  to  go  to  a  different  site  than  the  con-
sumer intended. 

In  addition  to  privacy  and  security  concerns,  spyware  and 
adware  programs  can  cause  computers  to  crash,  disconnect  from 
the Internet, and interfere with legitimate software programs. And, 
as Senator Nelson said, spyware companies target kids. One appli-
cation called BonziBUDDY creates a purple ape that swings across 
the  computer  screen,  telling  jokes,  singing  songs,  and  delivering 
voice ads. Children often download such programs and the parents 
have  no  clue  as  to  what  they  really  do,  and  the  children  have  no 
clue  as  to  what  the  spyware  does.  The  FTC  successfully  pursued 
Bonzi  software  for  violating  the  Children’s  Online  Privacy  Protec-
tion  Act,  but  that  has  not  stopped  companies  from  producing  and 
distributing spyware. 

The point is, having a law to crack down on folks is good. I have 
no  problem  with  it.  But  I  think  we  have  to  do  more  than  that,  be-
cause  clearly  it’s  still  going  on  even  though  there  have  been  law-
suits filed. The problem has grown to epidemic levels, it’s estimated 
that  the  market  for  ads  delivered  or  generated  by  adware  is  cur-
rently worth $2 billion a year. 

Last  October,  America  Online  and  the  National  Cyber  Security 
Alliance examined the computers of 329 randomly selected Internet 
users,  and  found  that  80  percent  of  them  contained  some  form  of 
spyware. The average infected computer had more than 90 spyware 
and  adware  programs.  This  trend  must  be  stopped.  It  harms  con-
sumers,  damages  computers  and  undermines  the  privacy  that  peo-
ple  expect  and  deserve,  and  it  goes  after  kids.  And  I  think  if  any-
thing unites us on this committee it should be that. 

Our bill simply says that all software makers, including spyware 
makers  cannot  sneak  onto  your  computer.  Specifically,  the  Spy 
Block Act prohibits the installation of any software without the no-
tice  and  consent  of  an  authorized  user.  Additionally,  the  software 
must  provide  clear  procedures  to  uninstall  the  software,  and  must 
be capable of being completely and easily removed. 

Some people have objected to our bill, saying it should focus only 
on  spyware  and  not  on  all  software.  The  problem  is  that  nobody 
thinks  the  software  they  produce  is  spyware.  That  is  why  our  bill 
covers all software; otherwise the people who produce spyware will 
simply try to define themselves out of the category by claiming that 
their  particular  software  is  not  spyware,  and  imagine  a  court  case 
on that. 

Consumers  deserve  to  be  protected.  Software  should  not  track  a 
person’s activities and that of his or her family. That’s Big Brother. 
That’s  Big  Sister,  and  that’s  what  we  have  to  stop.  And  I  would 
hope  my  colleagues  on  the  other  side  who  may  not  be  for  this  bill 
will  understand  what  we  are  talking  about  here.  We  are  fighting 
for the individual over an organization that wants to spy on them. 
So,  by  applying  common  principles  of  consumer  rights  for  all  soft-
ware,  we  deal  with  the  spyware  problem  and  enhanced  consumer 
rights on the Net. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  hope  we  can  get  this  bill  done,  and  I  look  for-
ward  to  working  with  you,  Senator  Nelson,  and  the  others  on  the 
Committee. Thank you. 

Senator BURNS. I thank Senator Boxer. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

We have been joined, among our very, very capable staff on both 
sides  of  the  aisle  by  a  new  staffer  this  morning,  and  we  would  in-
quire whether the new staff member over there would like to make 
a statement at this time. 

Staff  Member:  No,  thank  you  Mr.  Chairman,  but  your  gracious-

ness is appreciated. 

Senator BURNS. I would appreciate the status report. 
And we’re also joined this morning by Senator Wyden, who is no 
longer  a  member  of  this  committee,  and  was  a  very  good  member 
of  it,  and  we  worked  on  many  issues,  and  of  course  we’ve  worked 
on this one for a couple of years. We welcome him back this morn-
ing for a short statement. Welcome back, Senator Wyden. 

STATEMENT OF HON. RON WYDEN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator WYDEN. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
First  of  all,  I  want  to  prove  that  contrary  to  everything  that  is 
said  in  the  media,  not  every  Senate  speech  has  to  be  a  filibuster, 
so  I  am  going  to  be  real  short  this  morning  and  just  give  a  couple 
of  thoughts.  A  lot  of  you,  I  think,  got  the  sense  that  I  still  wish  I 
was on the other side of the desk with you. 

Senator BURNS. You are welcome to join us at any time. 
Senator  WYDEN.  That’s  a  very  kind  offer,  and  I  thank  you  very 
much  for  it.  I  think  there  are  the  makings  just  in  the  opening 
statements  that  I  heard  of  a  very  good  bipartisan  agreement,  be-
tween  you  and  I,  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  Nelson,  Senator  Boxer, 
and Senator Allen, who makes a lot of sense, too, in terms of talk-
ing about tough penalties. I think clearly there are all the makings 
for a very good bipartisan compromise. 

I  would  just  say,  the  last  time  out  the  major  effort  made  was 
with  respect  to  spam,  and  this  is  a  much  more  serious  problem. 
With  spam  you  can  hit  the  delete  button,  but  with  this  stuff  it 
crashes  your  system.  And,  so  people  now  don’t  know  where  it 
comes  from,  don’t  know  how  to  wipe  it  out,  and  this  is,  I  think,  a 
much  more  serious  problem  and  my  colleagues  essentially  touched 
on that. 

I  am  particularly  troubled  about  the  fact  that  it  really  stems,  as 
a spider web is created in our computer systems, from the fact that 
we’ve  got  to  figure  out  how  to  protect  people  doing  innocent  work 
and  innocent  businesses,  from  those  who  cross  the  line.  Much  of 
the  spyware  and  unwanted  adware  travels,  essentially,  as  impost-
ers via legitimate Internet advertising. What happens is companies 
enter  into  the  advertising  arrangements  with  legitimate  Internet 
ad  buyers,  who  then  go  out  to  advertising  networks  that  can  use 
thousands  of  affiliates,  sometimes  70,000  affiliates,  some  of  which 
are not legitimate. This array of affiliates are paid, in effect, by the 
click,  and  therefore  have  an  incentive  to  rack  up  the  largest  num-
ber  of  clicks  where  the  rogue  software  originates.  I  thought  it  was 
well described—and Senator Boxer’s been a great advocate on these 
issues—by  the  Los  Angeles  Times  just  a  few  days  ago,  they  said, 
‘‘if  an  affiliate  slips  a  deceptive  piece  of  software  into  somebody’s 
personal computer and persuades the owner to buy something, the 
transaction can then be passed to three or four businesses, each of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

which  take  a  cut  before  the  affiliate  network  hands  off  the  cus-
tomer to the merchant. 

That  is,  in  effect,  how  the  cyber  plague  can  grow  exponentially 
and  produce  the  figures  that  several  of  you  touched  on,  and  I  was 
especially  pleased  that  several  colleagues  essentially  described  the 
drive-by  download,  which  also  can  be—in  many  instances—how 
this originates. 

I’d  would  start  by  just  outlining  six  principles  I  think  could  be 
the basis of a bipartisan law bringing together my colleagues. First, 
let’s  make  sure  that  consumers  are  in  charge  of  their  computers, 
not some company that they want no part of. And you can start by 
banning drive-by downloads. 

Second, when somebody jumps on their computer they should not 
be  exposed  to  a  Coney  Island  full  of  hucksters  where  they  get 
tricked into installing software that they don’t want, or where they 
can’t  identify  the  source  of  the  ads.  So,  let’s  make  sure  the  con-
sumer is informed about who is providing the software. I think this 
touches  on  a  point  you  and  I  made  continually,  Senator  Burns, 
with  respect  to  the  spam  debate.  People  in  this  country  ought  to 
have a First Amendment right to communicate, but they also ought 
to  have  a  First  Amendment  right  to  tell  folks  to  stop  and  a  pre-
requisite to doing that is making sure they can identify the source 
of the ads. 

Third,  it  seems  to  me  no  software  should  allow  any  ad  or  infor-
mation collected at one website to travel with the users to another 
website. You stop that and you get at this problem of the affiliates 
that I touched on. 

Fourth, consumers need to be able to remove or disable any soft-
ware they don’t want, so that when software is installed on a com-
puter  it  should  not  be  an  irreversible  act,  and  I  think  techno-
logically that’s a possibility. 

Fifth, to pick up on the point that Senator Allen made, we ought 
to  come  down  on  the  offenders  with  hob  nail  boots,  that  means 
using  the  Federal  Trade  Commission,  the  states  Attorney  Gen-
eral—I  know  that  Eliot  Spitzer  brought  an  action  just  a  couple  of 
days ago to indicate that the states want to be good partners in it, 
and I support Senator Allen in that effort. 

Finally,  I  would  say  that  we  ought  to  protect  the  companies 
that—in  good  faith—try  to  help  consumers  get  rid  of  these  cyber 
plagues,  and  they  ought  not  be  scared  out  of  business  simply  be-
cause  they  are  trying  to  do  the  right  thing.  You  have  to  draw  a 
clear  line  between  legitimate  advertising  and  what  happens  when 
the spider’s web gets created through the affiliates, and the various 
approaches that end up junking our system full of all of this trash 
that really can crash the entire system. 

Mr. Chairman, you are kind to let me come, and if I had my way 
I would be up on the dais with all of you. I am just looking forward 
to  working  with  you  and  based  on  the  opening  statements  I  think 
this is there for the doing. 

Senator BURNS. Well, you are welcome to join us up here if you’d 

like, and stay for awhile. 

We  are  going  to  start  the  discussion  this  morning,  and  I  think 
that’s  what  we  want  to  do.  We’ve  got  several  representatives, 
stakeholders in this issue, and so we will start with Trevor Hughes 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

who  is  Executive  Director  of  the  Network  Advertising  Initiative. 
Mr. Hughes, we appreciate you coming today, and we look forward 
to  your  testimony.  If  you  want  to  shorten  your  testimony  up,  your 
full  statement  will  be  made  part  of  the  record.  And  thank  you  for 
coming this morning. 

STATEMENT OF J. TREVOR HUGHES, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

NETWORK ADVERTISING INITIATIVE 

Mr. HUGHES. Thank you, Senator Burns. 
Senator  Burns,  members  of  the  Committee,  good  morning.  My 
name  is  Trevor  Hughes;  I  am  the  Executive  Director  of  the  Net-
work Advertising Initiative. 

The NAI is a cooperative group of online companies dedicated to 
addressing  public  policy  issues  that  occur  at  the  intersection  of 
issues  of  privacy  and  technology,  and  online  marketing  and  adver-
tising. 

In  the  past,  the  NAI  has  successfully  launched  self-regulatory 
programs  dealing  with  issues  of  online  targeted  advertising.  We 
have also developed programs for the use of web beacons, we have 
been  active  in  the  e-mail  and  spam  debates,  and  I  have  had  the 
pleasure  of  testifying  before  this  committee  previously  on  issues  of 
spam. 

Our members, over the past year and a half have turned our at-
tention to the issue of spyware. What I would like to do this morn-
ing is present to you two dystopian visions of the future. And, these 
two  dystopian  visions  of  the  future  are  directly  related  to  our  ac-
tions over the coming months. 

The  first  vision  is  that  we  allow  spyware  to  continue  to  pro-
liferate.  And  that  would,  in  a  sense,  pollute  the  online  world  to 
such a degree as to make both e-commerce and the consumer expe-
rience  online  really  not  successful,  and  ultimately  a  failure.  That 
is a bad result for all of us on this panel, for all companies involved 
in  the  online  economy,  and  for  most  importantly,  consumers.  So, 
the first dystopian vision is spyware proliferates. And the members 
of my organization, and consumers, all suffer. 

But the second dystopian vision is similar to the statement from 
Senator Burns. And that is that our response to spyware is too ex-
treme. That we throw the baby out with the bath water. And what 
I  would  like  to  offer  today  is  the  good  work  of  the  NAI  and  our 
pledge  of  support,  to  hopefully  find  a  middle  ground.  I  would  like 
to  suggest  that  it’s  my  job,  our  members’  job,  and  really  the  work 
of  Congress  to  find  a  way  between  those  two  dystopian  visions  of 
the future, one in which spyware proliferates, and another in which 
the responses to spyware are so extreme as to limit the very thing 
that  we’re  trying  to  protect.  That  we  find  that  way  to  both  protect 
the  consumer  experience,  but  also  protect  legitimate  online  enter-
prise. 

I  think  most  importantly,  spyware  represents  an  erosion  of  con-
sumer trust. This erosion of consumer trust in the wake of spyware 
is  a  serious  problem  for  all  companies  in  the  online  marketplace. 
Put  simply,  spyware  threatens  the  economic  foundations  of  E-com-
merce.  And  I  think  I  could  link  arms  with  my  fellow  panelists 
today in making that statement. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

As a result, the NAI supports strong legislative and technological 
action against spyware. Our members cannot thrive in an environ-
ment  where  consumers  do  not  or  can  not  trust  the  businesses  and 
websites  that  they  encounter  on  web.  However,  our  members  have 
found  that  many  of  the  spyware  solutions  that  have  emerged  are 
creating  troubling  collateral  damage.  In  other  words,  some  of  the 
solutions  to  spyware  have  harmed  the  very  thing  we  are  trying  to 
protect. The power, the depth, and the free content of the Internet. 
Our  responses  to  spyware  must  carefully  balance  our  need  to  ag-
gressively  meet  the  threat,  while  protecting  the  continued  legiti-
mate use of the channel. 

For  this  reason,  the  members  of  the  NAI  strongly  support  Fed-
eral preemptive spyware legislation. We clearly need stronger legis-
lative  responses.  Federal  legislation  that  preempts  State  laws  and 
creates  a  single,  uniform  national  standard  will  both  address  the 
threat,  and  provide  a  clear  set  of  standards  for  the  online  market-
place. 

But  Federal  spyware  legislation  must  carefully  balance  these 
needs  for  aggressive  responses  against  overbroad  solutions.  Under 
some of the bills that have been introduced, ubiquitous and impor-
tant technological tools have been affected. Any legislation must be 
focused on the behavior associated with spyware, and that is fraud 
and  deception.  The  malicious  activities  of  purveyors  of  spyware 
must stop. 

But  technology  is  simply  the  tool  that  they  use  to  create  the 
problem.  It  is  not  the  problem  itself.  For  that  reason,  the  NAI  is 
strongly supportive of legislation that is technology neutral. And let 
me make one thing very clear. In a way that is very similar to the 
spam  debate  from  2  years  ago,  if  we  create  legislative  responses 
that  focus  on  technology,  the  purveyors  of  spyware  will  simply 
move to newer, more surreptitious, and different technologies, leav-
ing the companies that are legitimately using those technologies to 
bear  the  yolk  of  the  compliance  and  the  regulatory  standards  that 
have been placed upon them. 

Other  bills  that  we  have  seen  introduced  have  gone  far  beyond 
the  immediate  concerns  associated  with  fraudulent,  deceptive 
spyware,  and  have  proposed  standards  for  online  advertising  that 
will  be  very  harmful  to  the  primary  economic  support  for  the  vast 
quantities of free media online today. Make no mistake, the reason 
that  Google  can  offer,  perhaps,  the  most  powerful  search  engine 
and  research  tool  the  world  has  ever  seen,  is  because  advertising 
supports their operation. The reason that Yahoo! and the New York 
Times, really every publisher in the world today, can offer free con-
tent online is because advertising supports those operations. Focus-
ing in an excessive way on online advertising and spyware legisla-
tion calls into question, or may indeed threaten, some of those busi-
ness models. 

We must also be wary of spyware legislation that inappropriately 
includes  online  privacy  standards.  I  think  it  would  confuse  the 
issue  to  discuss  spyware  at  the  same  time  that  we  discuss  online 
privacy. And again, the NAI is an organization that has been dedi-
cated to finding standards that are appropriate, and meaningful at 
the  intersection  of  the  online  world  and  privacy.  So,  we  are  pre-
pared  and  in  fact  are  very  open  to  and  encouraged  by  discussions 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

of  online  privacy.  But  online  privacy  is  a  separate  discussion  from 
spyware,  and  we  should  handle  them  separately.  Basically,  the 
NAI  feels  that  spyware  legislation  should  focus  carefully  and  pre-
cisely on fraudulent and deceptive practices. 

Let me speak for a moment on another topic, and that is techno-
logical  solutions  to  spyware.  These  solutions  are  a  promising  op-
tion,  in  fact,  they  are  needed,  and  the  NAI  supports  calls  for  con-
sumers to have anti-spyware programs on their desktops. However, 
some  anti-spyware  technologies  are  inappropriately  alarming  con-
sumers  by  flagging,  and  in  some  cases  deleting,  legitimate  tech-
nologies.  In  one  case,  cookies.  Cookies  are  not  spyware,  and  any 
technological  solution  must  be  carefully  tailored  to  recognize,  and 
leave  intact,  legitimate  tools  used  by  companies  legitimately  en-
gaged in the online economy. 

The  NAI  feels  strongly  that  solutions  to  spyware  problems  must 
be  advanced.  Federal  preemptive  legislation,  aggressive  enforce-
ment  of  existing  laws,  accountable  and  transparent  technological 
solutions  and  industry  self-regulation  can  all  work  effectively  to-
ward eradicating fraudulent and deceptive practices of spyware. 

Mr.  Chairman,  the  members  of  the  NAI  pledge  our  support  in 
this  fight.  Spyware  is  a  complex  problem,  and  our  solutions  must 
be  thoughtful,  robust,  and  comprehensive.  I  thank  you  for  your 
time today, and I will be happy to take any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Hughes follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF J. TREVOR HUGHES, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

NETWORK ADVERTISING INITIATIVE 

Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee,  I  want  to  thank  you  for  inviting 
me  to  testify.  My  name  is  Trevor  Hughes,  and  I  am  the  Executive  Director  of  the 
Network Advertising Initiative (NAI). The Network Advertising Initiative is a trade 
association representing companies concerned about issues of privacy, consumer pro-
tection,  and  online  technologies.  In  this  role,  the  NAI  has  taken  a  leadership  posi-
tion  on  issues  of  cookies,  online  advertising,  spam,  web  beacons,  the  Platform  for 
Privacy  Preferences  (P3P),  and  privacy  legislation.  The  group  has  now  turned  its 
focus to the growing problem of spyware and the related concern of unintended con-
sequences for legitimate technologies and business models. 

The  extent  of  the  spyware  problem  has  been  reported  extensively  in  the  media. 
In  many  ways,  spyware  has  become  one  of  the  most  compelling  consumer  issues  in 
the  e-commerce  and  online  world.  Spyware  can  cause  serious  problems,  and  even 
cripple  computer  systems.  There  is  ample  anecdotal  evidence  of  spyware  substan-
tially  impairing  the  speed  of  consumers’  computers.  The  fraudulent  and  deceptive 
nature  of  spyware  has  resulted  in  legitimate  consumer  outcry.  Businesses  also 
struggle under the onslaught of spyware. Employees’ systems can be seriously com-
promised by spyware. This raises serious concerns about productivity, security, and 
corporate  intellectual  property.  Untold  hours  of  customer  service  support  are  being 
spent in response to spyware problems on consumer and employee desktops. 

But  the  erosion  of  consumer  trust  in  online  activities  and  e-commerce  is  perhaps 
the  most  economically  damaging  effect  of  spyware.  Billions  of  dollars  have  been 
spent in realizing the promise of e-commerce. Nearly every industry now uses online 
tools—including e-mail, instant messaging, internet telephony, and e-commerce gen-
erally—to  transact  business  within  companies  and  with  customers.  These  invest-
ments  are  at  peril  if  consumers  distrust  the  very  medium  through  which  they  are 
transacting business. 

There  have  been  numerous  surveys  and  polls  taken  to  determine  whether  the 
threat of spyware and other deceptive practices has influenced consumer confidence 
with  the  Internet.  In  August  2004,  Greenfield  Online  conducted  a  poll  regarding 
Internet user’s concerns and perceptions regarding Internet security issues. Accord-
ing  to  the  results,  80%  are  concerned  about  online  identity  theft,  72%  would  bank 
online  for  the  first  time  if  security  was  improved,  and  90%  of  existing  online  bank-
ers  would  utilize  higher  value  services  if  there  was  better  protection  from  identity 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

theft.1 In  a  September  2004  Dell  and  IEF  poll,  almost  4  of  every  10  people  polled 
felt less secure using computers than a year earlier.2 The results seem to show that 
consumers are becoming weary and wary. 

When  considered  with  the  growing  problems  of  phishing,  ID  theft,  viruses,  and 
general  online  fraud,  the  spyware  problem  exemplifies  an  increasing  crisis  in  con-
sumer confidence in the online channel. If spyware is allowed to proliferate, we will 
be left with a distinctly dystopian future in which the web is so polluted with fraud 
and  deception  as  to  be  unusable  by  the  public.  In  such  a  scenario,  everyone  loses. 
Industry  and  public  policy  solutions  to  the  spyware  problem  have  been  quick  to 
arise.  Clearly,  companies  engaged  in  the  online  economy  have  a  strong  incentive  to 
eradicate spyware. But any legislative and technological solutions must be carefully 
crafted to ensure that we do not throw the proverbial baby out with the bath-water. 
We  must  be  sure  to  protect  benign  technologies  and  legitimate  business  models  as 
we pursue the purveyors of spyware. 

We must also recognize the value of effective industry self regulation in the online 
economy.  Legislative  and  technological  responses  frequently  do  not  provide  the  fine 
tuning  necessary  to  proscribe  the  boundaries  of  acceptable  corporate  practices  on-
line.  There  are  many  examples  of  strong  self  regulatory  efforts  in  e-commerce  that 
should  be  applauded  and  encouraged  as  a  meaningful  tool  to  address  public  policy 
concerns. 
The Legislative Response 

Over  the  past  two  years,  many  legislative  proposals  have  been  introduced  in  re-
sponse  to  the  spyware  problem.  Currently,  there  are  at  least  3  bills  in  Congress, 
and  over  30  bills  in  the  states.  Four  states  have  passed  spyware  legislation.  It  is 
possible,  if  not  probable,  that  we  will  have  over  a  dozen  spyware  laws  at  the  state 
level  by  the  close  of  this  year.  As  these  laws  proliferate,  the  challenges  for  legiti-
mate businesses to comply with the myriad of state standards increase significantly. 
The  members  of  the  NAI  feel  strongly  that  Federal  preemptive  legislation  is  cur-
rently  needed.  We  recognize,  perhaps  more  than  most  other  companies,  the  serious 
challenge  presented  by  the  growing  gauntlet  of  state  spyware  laws.  In  the  United 
States today, we have 4 spyware laws on the books (one is currently enjoined under 
a  constitutional  challenge)  and  over  30  bills  proposed.  If  the  trend  towards  state 
spyware  legislation  continues,  we  will  end  up  with  a  crazy  quilt  of  standards  that 
makes  compliance  overly  burdensome  for  legitimate  business.  In  such  a  scenario, 
preemptive Federal legislation is necessary to set a common platform for the Nation. 
But  spyware  legislation  at  the  Federal  level  should  not  be  passed  only  to  create 
a  common  standard  for  the  Nation.  Rather,  the  primary  focus  of  the  legislation 
should  be  to  address  the  dire  threat  posed  by  pernicious  behavior  online.  Spyware 
is  fundamentally  an  act  of  deception.  And  Federal  spyware  legislation  should  focus 
carefully  on  the  fraudulent  and  deceptive  behaviors  associated  with  the  problem. 
The  NAI  therefore  strongly  supports  legislative  efforts  the  target  those  acts  associ-
ated with spyware that are fraudulent and deceptive in their very nature. 

But  how  do  we  know  what  is  fraudulent  online?  In  the  Spring  of  2004,  the  Con-
sumer  Software  Working  Group  (CSWG),  a  group  formed  under  the  leadership  of 
Ari  Schwartz  from  the  Center  for  Democracy  and  Technology,  recognized  the  grow-
ing  concern  over  spyware  and  worked  to  compile  a  list  of  devious  practices  in 
downloaded  applications  (spyware).  The  CSWG  categorized  the  practices  into  three 
areas,  hijacking,  surreptitious  surveillance,  and  inhibiting  termination.  The  CSWG 
list  of  devious  practices  is  a  valuable  tool  for  identifying  the  fraudulent  and  decep-
tive  practices  that  exist  online.  And  the  influence  of  the  effort  can  be  readily  seen 
in Section 2 of H.R. 29, a leading spyware bill in the House of Representatives. 

The NAI participated in the development of the CSWG devious practices list and 
applauds  Mr.  Schwartz  and  the  CDT  for  their  leadership  on  this  important  issue. 
Our  members  feel  that  Section  2  of  H.R.  29  represents  an  important  tool  for  com-
bating fraud and deception in spyware. 

Unfortunately, many of the legislative proposals currently under consideration go 
far  beyond  fraud  and  deception.  Indeed,  H.R.  29,  while  providing  meaningful  re-
sponses  in  Section  2  (dealing  with  deceptive  practices)  goes  too  far  by  proscribing 
many  online  advertising  practices.  The  NAI  does  not  support  legislative  standards 
that  endeavor  to  place  limits  on  the  use  of  online  advertising.  Online  advertising 
is the primary economic force that creates the enormous amount of free content we 

1 Survey  Finds  Identity  Theft  Negatively  Impacting  Consumer  Use  of  the  Internet,  October 

19, 2004, http://biz.yahoo.com/prnews/041019/datu019l1.html 

2 IED-Dell  Survey  conducted  between  September  17–19,  2004  by  Ipsos-Public  Affairs.  Results 
also  mentioned  in  the  Washington  Post  article  ‘‘Dell  Joins  Spyware  Fight,’’  October  18,  2004, 
http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/articles/A41629-2004Oct18.html 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

enjoy  online  today.  Proscribing  online  advertising  will  compromise  that  economic 
model, and may threaten the availability of free resources online. 

Further,  many  legislative  proposals  confuse  the  spyware  debate  with  online  pri-
vacy.  While  there  are  definitely  privacy  violations  that  are  occurring  through 
spyware, a broad online privacy response that covers all online activities is not war-
ranted. Online privacy should be considered separately from spyware. 

Another approach that has been seen in response to spyware is to limit the tech-
nologies  that  the  purveyors  use  to  perpetrate  their  fraud.  But  this  response  is 
flawed.  Spyware  is  not  caused  by  technology.  Indeed,  in  many  cases  the  technology 
is  irrelevant  to  the  practice  involved.  If  legislation  were  to  limit  a  certain  tech-
nology,  the  purveyors  of  spyware  would  simply  move  to,  or  develop,  other  tech-
nologies  to  continue  their  activities.  Prohibiting  or  proscribing  technologies  is  not 
good public policy. 

A  good  example  of  a  technology  that  has  been  implicated  in  the  spyware  debate 
is  cookies.  Put  simply,  a  cookie  is  a  mechanism  that  allows  a  website  to  recognize 
a particular computer as it visits that site. Cookies power a huge number of critical 
web functions today—preference management, shopping baskets, advertising, audit-
ing and analytics all use cookies. 

There  have  been  privacy  concerns  related  to  the  use  of  cookies,  and  these  issues 
are  valid  and  important.  As  a  result,  cookies  have  been  thoroughly  vetted  through 
public  policy  channels.  Cookies  are  not  spyware.  They  have  been  thoroughly  re-
viewed  and  managed  through  technology,  regulation,  and  self  regulation.  Any  fur-
ther standards create very real threats to the reinvigorated online economy. E-com-
merce,  online  advertising,  and  free  online  content  all  pivot  upon  the  use  of  cookies. 
Any  legislation  addressing  spyware  must  make  it  clear  that  cookies  are  not 
spyware.  A  legislative  approach  that  focuses  on  behavior  (fraud  and  deception)  and 
not technology will achieve this result. 

Another  issue  that  has  arisen  in  the  legislative  debate  over  spyware  is  whether 
companies  engaged  in  the  technological  responses  to  spyware  (anti-spyware  tech-
nologies) should be provided protections under the law. The members of the NAI feel 
strongly  that  all  companies  in  the  online  world  should  be  accountable  for  their  ac-
tions.  Providing  a  ‘‘good  Samaritan’’  safe  harbor  for  anti-spyware  companies  would 
remove  the  necessary  checks  and  balances  that  encourage  such  companies  to  pro-
vide  solutions  that  are  carefully  targeted  at  actual  spyware.  We  therefore  do  not 
support such provisions. 
Conclusion 

The NAI feels strongly that spyware is a critical threat to e-commerce and online 
advertising.  We  applaud  and  support  legislative  efforts  that  are  narrowly  tailored 
to  offer  better  tools  to  pursue  fraud  and  deception.  We  stand  together  with  advo-
cates,  consumers,  and  public  policy  leaders  in  demanding  accountability  for  the  ne-
farious actions of the purveyors of spyware. 

However,  much  of  the  current  discussion  regarding  spyware  has  inappropriately 
included  limits  on  online  advertising,  privacy  standards,  and  benign  technologies 
such as cookies. Limits on online advertising and broad online privacy mandates are 
inappropriate in a spyware bill. And technological proscriptions may hinder the use 
of  fundamental  tools  of  e-commerce.  Any  restrictions  on  these  technologies  could 
have devastating consequences for the online economy. 

The  NAI  therefore  urges  public  policymakers  to  carefully  draft  any  spyware 
standards  to  narrowly  focus  on  fraud  and  deception.  Legislation  should  be  inher-
ently  technology-neutral  and  not  impair  the  continued  growth  of  the  online  adver-
tising market. 

But  legislative  solutions  are  not  enough  to  solve  the  spyware  problem.  We  need 
to  have  effective,  and  accountable,  technologies  to  respond  to  the  pollution  on  con-
sumers’ desktops. And industry self regulation must be supported to provide strong 
guidance for the legitimate actors in the online economy. 

Mr.  Chairman,  on  behalf  of  the  members  of  the  NAI,  I  pledge  our  efforts  to  con-
tinue  to  work  on  this  issue  and  to  support  the  important  work  of  this  committee 
in  fighting  spyware.  Spyware  is  a  complex  problem,  and  our  responses  must  be 
thoughtful, robust and comprehensive. 

Thank you. I look forward to your questions. 

Senator BURNS. Thank you very much. Now we have David Moll, 
who  is  Chief  Executive  Officer,  Webroot  Software,  Incorporation, 
and thanks for coming this morning. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

STATEMENT OF C. DAVID MOLL, CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER, 

WEBROOT SOFTWARE, INC. 

14 

Mr. MOLL. Thank you, Senator Burns, and members of the Com-

mittee. 

Senator  BURNS.  Pull  the  mike  up.  You’ve  got  a  nice  voice;  we 

should have everybody hear it. 

Mr. MOLL. Thank you, sir, I’m flattered. 
Thank  you  for  inviting  me  here  today.  My  name  is  David  Moll, 
and  I  am  the  CEO  of  Webroot  Software  in  Boulder,  Colorado. 
Webroot  is  a  privately  held  company  backed  by  some  of  the  indus-
try’s leading venture capital firms, including Technology Crossover 
Ventures,  Axel  Partner,  and  Mayfield.  I  would  like  to  ask  that  my 
complete  written  testimony  be  included  in  the  record,  and  I  will 
summarize for you here, the key points. 

Founded in 1997, Webroot has created innovative privacy protec-
tion and performance solutions used by millions of computers users 
around  the  world.  Our  customers  include  Fortune  500  companies, 
Internet  service  providers,  government  agencies,  higher  education 
institutions,  small  businesses,  and  individuals.  We  are  most  well- 
known  as  the  creators  of  a  leading  anti-spyware  product,  Spy 
Sweeper, released in 2003. 

At the high level there are four primary ways that spyware rep-
resents  a  threat  to  us  today:  data  security;  online  privacy;  net-
working  computer  performance;  and  more  broadly,  Internet  com-
merce.  Data  security  is  a  key  element.  Whereas  a  primary  risk  of 
computer  viruses  has  always  been  data  corruption,  spyware  poses 
a  very  real  threat  to  data  security  itself.  Some  of  the  most  at-risk 
data  today  includes:  national  security  information,  including  de-
fense  and  homeland  security;  intellectual  property  and  trade  se-
crets;  financial  records;  customer  data;  personal  health  informa-
tion;  and  a  wealth  of  other  sensitive  data  such  as  passwords  and 
account  numbers.  Instances  where  these  risks  have  been  realized 
are, in fact, numerous today and include shocking realities. 

Hill Air Force Base in Utah, part of the Strategic Air Command, 
has identified and removed a substantial spyware infection, includ-
ing keystroke loggers. The Oklahoma City, Kentucky Sheriff’s office 
identified three PCs, seemingly a small example. However, each of 
these PCs had access to homeland security updates, prisoner trans-
fer records and personnel files. Val Software, Incorporated, 3 years 
ago  was  penetrated  by  spyware  and  source  code  for  their  leading 
product  that  was  then  posted  on  the  Internet,  nearly  crippling  the 
company.  A  leading  mutual  fund  company  with  more  than  2,000 
employees  recently  identified  8,000  high-risk  pieces  of  spyware  on 
their network in only 1 month of administering an anti-spyware so-
lution.  And  finally,  the  payroll  systems  of  the  Bay  City,  Michigan 
school  systems  were  found  riddled  with  spyware,  again,  including 
keystroke  loggers.  These  are  just  a  few  examples  of  a  widespread 
problem that threatens data security across our country. 

As  it  relates  to  online  privacy,  the  privacy  threat  of  spyware  in 
this cyber age is the equivalent to trespassing in your home, much 
the way Senator Boxer suggested. Some of the types of information 
that  can  be  collected  by  spyware  programs  without  the  informed 
consent of the computer owner, are your browsing habits, the sites 
you’ve  visited,  search  terms  you’ve  used,  advertisements  you 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

clicked  on,  bookmarks  or  favorites  that  you’ve  entered,  contents 
you’ve  downloaded,  applications  that  you’ve  used,  entire  e-mail  or 
instant  messaging  conversations,  user  names,  passwords,  and  cer-
tainly  personal  information  such  as  social  security  numbers  and 
credit card numbers. 

During  the  first  quarter  of  this  year,  one  of  our  Nation’s  largest 
financial  services  companies  determined  that  100  percent  of  the 
fraud penetrated through their online banking portal was achieved 
through the use of spyware. As it relates to network and computer 
performance,  at  a  minimum,  it  is  a  nuisance  to  have  your  com-
puting  resources  used  by  programs  you  didn’t  knowingly  install. 
Studies during the last year show that spyware consumes an inor-
dinate amount of computing resource, and as spyware multiplies on 
a  PC,  the  impact  increases  in  a  super  linear  fashion.  With  as  few 
as  three  or  four  pieces  of  spyware  on  a  single  PC,  and  mind  you, 
that the AOL study found as many as 90—the machine can become 
unusable—with  its  memory  dominated  by  spyware  processes,  the 
hard  drive  used  to  cache  advertisements,  and  the  connection 
jammed  with  spyware/server  communications.  Not  surprisingly, 
this  leads  to  a  larger  economic  impact  in  terms  of  the  number  of 
support  calls  caused  by  spyware—predominantly  with  Internet 
service  providers  and  computer  makers.  Dell  Computer  deter-
mined—and  this  goes  back  to  the  2003–2004  testimony  that  they 
gave  to  the  FTC—one  in  five  of  the  calls  made  to  their  consumer 
support  line  is  driven  by  a  spyware-related  problem.  This  figure 
stands today. A leading global IT services firm has determined that 
spyware-related support calls to their internal help-desk makes up 
70 percent of their support requests, costing that organization mil-
lions. 

Finally,  spyware  poses  a  threat  to  Internet  commerce  itself.  The 
increasing  complexity  and  security  concerns  that  arise  from 
spyware,  and  the  new  uses  of  spyware  in  phishing  and  pharming 
attacks,  have  created  a  new  level  of  user  concern  that  threatens 
trust  in  the  online  economy.  The  threat  has  proven  so  dramatic 
that Citigroup recently entered into a partnership with Webroot to 
provide  anti-spyware  protection  for  their  card  holders  and  employ-
ees in defense of their customers and the folks who work for them. 
Based  on  recent  Webroot  research,  there  are  more  than  250,000 
websites  that  leverage  and  exploit  a  security  hole  which  allows 
spyware to contaminate a user’s computer with no interaction from 
the user—a practice known as the drive-by download. Often this is 
affected  from  websites  that  leverage  misspelled  URLs,  and  includ-
ing  a  recent  example  where  Google.com  suffered  this  very  effect. 
This  experience  shakes  the  confidence  of  users,  and  deters  e-com-
merce itself. 

As  shocking  as  some  of  the  examples  of  spyware’s  victims  may 
be,  the  pervasiveness  is  even  more  shocking.  Webroot’s  survey  of 
more  than  one  million  PCs  last  quarter,  reveals  that  88  percent  of 
home computers, 64 percent if we exclude tracking cookies, and 87 
percent  of  business  computers,  55  percent  without  cookies,  are  in-
fected with some form of spyware. I’ll point to you the sample size 
here  of  more  than  a  million  PCs  relative  to  that  AOL  study.  We 
have  a  great  deal  of  additional  data  about  spyware  that  we  have 
assembled  in  the  Webroot  State  of  Spyware  report.  I  would  like  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

ask that a copy of this report be included, along with my testimony, 
in  the  hearing  record  and,  members  of  the  Committee,  I  think 
you’ve  already  received  both  hard  and  soft  copies  of  this  report. * 

Senator BURNS. We have, and we will put that in the record. 
Mr. MOLL. With the limited time that I have left, I’d like to move 
on to how we fight spyware. Individuals in the industry have been 
able to combat viruses successfully. Perpetrated by individuals, the 
defenses  have  been  organized  and  well-funded.  But,  for  the  first 
time,  we  now  fight  an  organized  and  well-funded  threat.  Spyware 
is  part  of  a  calculated  business  plan,  or  it’s  a  tool  that  is  used  by 
criminals.  In  both  cases,  there  are  clear  economic  motives  behind 
the  proliferation  of  spyware.  We  believe  that  the  advertising-in-
spired revenues here alone are in excess of $2 billion dollars annu-
ally, and the fraudulent side is rising as well. In order to effectively 
fight  this  problem,  we  need  technical  solutions,  clear  public  policy 
and  strong  legal  enforcement.  In  addition  to  existing  law,  which 
provides  for  complaints  by  the  FTC  and  the  attorneys  general,  we 
also anticipate benefits from legislation such as Senator Burns’ bill. 
The  bill  provides  additional  clarity  and  focus  on  the  problems  that 
we are seeing, and we hope that it will induce additional attention 
from law enforcement agencies. Again, I thank you for inviting me 
here  today,  and  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  come  and  share 
with  you  some  of  what  we  have  learned  over  the  last  few  years. 
And, I welcome any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Moll follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF C. DAVID MOLL, CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER, 

WEBROOT SOFTWARE, INC. 

Chairman Stevens, Senator Inouye, and Committee members, thank you for invit-
ing  me  to  speak  to  you  today.  My  name  is  David  Moll  and  I  am  CEO  of  Webroot 
Software, headquartered in Boulder, Colorado. Webroot is a privately held company 
that  is  backed  by  some  of  the  industry’s  leading  venture  capital  firms,  including 
Technology Crossover Ventures, Accel Partners and Mayfield. 

Founded in 1997, Webroot has created innovative privacy, protection and perform-
ance solutions used by millions of computer users around the world. Our customers 
include  Fortune  500  companies,  Internet  service  providers,  government  agencies, 
higher education institutions, small businesses and individuals. 

In 2002, our research team, which consisted of just two people, saw a growing pat-
tern  of  undisclosed  downloads  that  caused  numerous  problems  for  computer  users. 
We joined a small band of early activists that began calling these kinds of programs 
spyware.  We  introduced  a  product  called  Spy  Sweeper  in  February  of  2003  to  help 
our  customers  fight  this  newly  identified  problem.  When  first  introduced,  Spy 
Sweeper found around 200 various programs, and easily removed them all. 

We  have  been  running  at  breakneck  speed  to  stay  a  step  ahead  of  spyware  ever 
since. Today, we are a company of 250 professionals focused on combating this prob-
lem.  Our  research  team  has  grown  to  over  30  people,  a  good  number  of  whom  de-
velop  and  maintain  the  automated  tools  we  use  to  outpace  the  developments  in 
spyware. Spy Sweeper, has also changed to adopt new weaponry to combat spyware 
that is increasingly hard to identify, and at times even harder to remove. This week 
we will introduce Spy Sweeper 4.0, our latest edition, with more than one-half mil-
lion  lines  of  software  code.  This  our  14th  major  release  of  the  product  in  a  little 
more than two years. 
The Effects of Spyware 

Spyware  and  its  ability  to  access  a  user’s  machine  without  informed  consent  for 
financial  gain  is  an  epidemic  that  threatens  the  viability  of  the  Internet  as  a  com-
merce, entertainment, communications and educational tool. Spyware programs can 
be  used  to  facilitate  the  unauthorized  use  of  computers  for  things  like  spam  relay, 

* The information referred to has been retained in Committee files. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

and distributed denial of service attacks. Spyware programs can also lead to identity 
theft, and the theft of intellectual property, as well as data leaks, and the degrada-
tion of computer performance. Spyware is difficult to detect, and even more difficult 
(if not impossible) for the average user to completely remove manually. 

At a high level, there are four primary ways that spyware presents a threat: data 
security; online privacy; network and computer performance; and Internet commerce 
broadly. 

Data  Security—Whereas  a  primary  risk  of  computer  viruses  is  data  corruption, 
spyware  poses  very  real  threats  to  data  security.  Some  of  the  most  at  risk  data  in-
cludes: 

• national security including defense and homeland security; 
• intellectual property and trade secrets; 
• financial records; 
• customer data; 
• personal health information; and, 
• other sensitive data such as passwords and account numbers. 
Working with government entities and corporate customers over the past year, we 
have  witnessed  breaches  involving  each  of  these  sensitive  kinds  of  data.  There  are 
cases where spyware was used to infiltrate local law enforcement computers, trading 
and  financial  systems  at  financial  institutions,  payroll  systems  at  Fortune  500  cor-
porations, central databases for school systems, and entire municipal computer oper-
ations. 

In  these  kinds  of  environments,  even  a  very  small  number  of  system  monitors  or 

keyloggers puts highly-sensitive information at risk. 

Privacy—When  placed  on  a  machine  without  the  informed  consent  of  the  com-
puter  owner,  spyware  is  the  cyber-age  equivalent  of  someone  trespassing  into  your 
home.  Some  of  the  types  of  information  collected  by  spyware  programs  without  the 
knowledge of the computer owner are: 
• browsing habits and sites visited; 
• search terms used; 
• advertisements clicked on; 
• bookmarks and favorites; 
• downloaded content; 
• applications used; 
• e-mail and instant message conversations; 
• usernames and passwords; and 
• personal information, such as social security numbers. 
While few argue about the sanctity of personally identifiable information, we often 
hear  the  argument  that  collecting  aggregated  browser  habits  to  provide  more  tar-
geted  advertising  is  not  a  privacy  invasion.  We  disagree.  In  our  view,  it  is  wrong 
to  download  programs  or  data  files  without  the  informed  consent  of  the  computer 
owner  for  marketing  purposes.  Such  marketing  behavior  begins  the  slippery  slope 
of  reasoning  that  leads  to  more  egregious  privacy  violations  by  malicious  spyware. 
Think  about  this  in  the  offline  environment.  Would  it  be  ok  for  a  marketing  firm 
to  go  into  your  home  without  your  knowledge  to  look  at  the  books  on  your  shelves 
to decide what to market to you? Would it be ok if they did it to everyone and aggre-
gated the data? 

Computer and Network Performance—Spyware can seriously impact computer and 
network  performance.  At  a  minimum,  it  is  an  undesirable  nuisance  to  have  your 
computing  resources  used  by  programs  you  didn’t  install,  and  do  not  want.  There 
is  also  a  larger  economic  impact  in  terms  of  the  number  of  support  center  calls 
caused by spyware. According to Dell Computer, one of every five customer support 
calls  are  related  to  spyware,  adversely  affecting  the  profitability  of  their  consumer 
business. 

In  corporate  environments,  where  many  computers  are  centrally  supported  and 
managed, spyware can drive up the total cost of ownership in the IT system; a lead-
ing IT services firm estimates that spyware costs them millions annually in produc-
tivity and support costs, and constitutes as much as 70 percent of their internal help 
desk call volume. 

In  the  worst  cases,  systems  can  crash  from  an  overload  of  spyware  programs,  re-
sulting  in  the  loss  of  data  and  computer  assets.  This  part  of  the  spyware  threat  is 
too  often  overlooked  or  underestimated,  yet  productivity  costs  associated  with 
spyware are far greater than spam. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

Internet  commerce—At  a  macro  level,  spyware  also  presents  a  threat  to  Internet 
commerce  as  a  whole.  The  increasing  complexity  and  security  concerns  that  arise 
from  spyware,  and  the  new  uses  of  spyware,  such  as  phishing  and  pharming  at-
tacks, have created a new level of user concern. 

Based  on  our  recent  research,  there  are  more  than  250,000  webpages  that  lever-
age a weakness we call an ‘‘exploit’’ which allows them to contaminate a user’s com-
puter with some form of spyware even when there is no interaction from the user— 
a  practice  known  as  a  drive-by  download.  Quite  often  these  sites  hosting  drive-by 
downloads  operate  using  URLs  that  are  commonly  misspelled  or  mistyped  alter-
natives  to  the  URLs  of  popular  sites.  For  example,  just  last  week,  Internet  users 
planning 
inadvertently  mistyped  and  entered 
www.googkle.com became the unwitting victims of drive-by downloads. 

to  visit  Google’s  site  who 

In  the  consumer  world,  spyware  represents  the  same  potential  for  fraud  that  in-
ternal spyware infections represent to corporations. For example a leading financial 
institution  working  with  Webroot  determined  than  100  percent  of  the  e-commerce 
fraud experienced by the bank in the past quarter was tied to spyware on end user 
machines.  Spyware,  keystroke  loggers  in  particular,  that  can  be  installed  from 
drive-by  sites  or  via  e-mails,  have  become  new  methods  to  those  harvesting  identi-
ties and defrauding consumers via the Internet. 

As  more  people  become  aware  of  these  numbers  and  understand  the  threat  of 
spyware, we are concerned about an overall negative effect on consumer trust in the 
online economy. 
The Growth of Spyware 

Spyware  has  become  pervasive.  Webroot’s  survey  of  more  than  one  million  PCs 
in the last quarter reveals that 88 percent of home computers (64 percent if we ex-
clude  tracking  cookies)  and  87  percent  of  business  computers  (55  percent  if  we  ex-
clude  tracking  cookies)  are  infected  with  some  form  of  spyware.  The  good  news  is 
that  awareness  is  increasing,  and  more  people  are  installing  programs,  like 
Webroot’s  Spy  Sweeper,  to  prevent  and  contain  spyware  from  impacting  their  sys-
tem. The bad news is that the spyware purveyors are financially motivated, creative 
and  resourceful.  Therefore,  we  face  a  constant  escalation  in  the  amount  of  spyware 
we have to fight. 

To give you an idea about the growth rate of spyware, Webroot identifies between 
50  and  100  new  pieces  of  spyware  every  week,  and  between  200  to  500  pieces  of 
spyware  that  have  ‘‘morphed’’  to  avoid  detection  and  removal.  With  the  help  of  a 
spyware  research  system  we  call  Phileas,  which  I  will  explain  further  later,  Spy 
Sweeper currently detects about 88,000 spyware traces—individual files which make 
up a piece of spyware. 

Understanding  the  growth  of  spyware  requires  more  than  just  data  about  infec-
tion  rates.  It  also  requires  that  we  understand  the  impetus  behind  propagating 
these  programs.  Spyware  is  not  like  a  virus  designed  by  a  ‘‘script  kiddie’’  who  just 
wants  to  show  off.  Spyware  is  part  of  a  calculated  business  plan,  or  a  tool  used  by 
criminals.  In  both  instances  there  are  clear  economic  motives  behind  the  prolifera-
tion of spyware. 

In  order  to  effectively  fight  this  problem,  it  is  essential  that  we  have  a  clear  pic-
ture of economic drivers, infection rates and trends. Recognizing this need, Webroot 
began  work  earlier  this  year  to  create  a  report  that  would  encapsulate  all  of  the 
key  aspects  of  the  issue.  The  result  is  the  Webroot  State  of  Spyware  report  which 
we issued this past week. This is a broad and detailed accounting of spyware today. 
We continue to compile this data, and we will issue updates to our report quarterly. 
To  ensure  that  you  have  all  the  information  we  assembled,  I’d  like  to  ask  that 
a  copy  of  the  report  be  included  in  the  hearing  record  as  an  appendix  to  my  testi-
mony. 
Fighting Spyware 

Until  recently,  the  primary  methods  for  fighting  spyware  were  reactive.  Anti- 
spyware  companies  concentrated  on  fixing  an  already  infected  machine.  That  alone 
presents  a  significant  challenge,  because  in  order  for  us  to  do  our  job  correctly,  we 
need  to  not  only  detect  and  quarantine  the  spyware  programs,  but  we  also  need  to 
ensure that we do not interfere with any legitimate files in the process. 

Once  we  mastered  the  techniques  to  accomplish  these  two  things,  we  worked  to 
figure  out  a  method  that  would  not  only  cure  spyware  infections  but  also  prevent 
them.  Last  year,  we  launched  the  Webroot  Phileas  Malware  Crawler  that  I  ref-
erenced  earlier.  Phileas  is  the  anti-spyware  industry’s  first  automated  spyware  re-
search  system.  Phileas  deploys  hundreds  of  automated  programs—called  bots—to 
crawl  the  Web  searching  for  spyware.  In  less  than  an  hour,  a  single  Phileas  bot 
completes  the  equivalent  of  10  days  of  manual  research  by  a  trained  person.  With 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

the  speed  and  scale  of  the  Phileas  system,  we  travel  the  Internet  every  day  to  find 
spyware  before  it  attacks  our  customers.  We  complement  systems  like  Phileas  with 
‘‘shields’’ built into the Spy Sweeper software which protect users’ systems from the 
common  behaviors  of  spyware,  stopping  the  threat  before  it  can  take  hold  of  a  sys-
tem. 

Ultimately,  we  believe  that  it  is  best  to  fight  technology  with  technology,  and  we 
remain  committed  to  continuing  to  provide  the  very  best  commercially  available 
technology  solutions  to  fighting  spyware.  However,  we  also  believe  that  there  is  a 
vital  role  for  legislators,  regulatory  agencies  and  law  enforcement  to  play  in  this 
fight. 

As I stated earlier, there are economic motivations behind the growth of spyware. 
Some  of  the  companies  involved  in  the  proliferation  are  considered  legitimate  U.S. 
based  companies.  The  complaint  filed  by  the  FTC  against  Seismic,  and  the  NY  At-
torney  General’s  case  against  Intermix,  demonstrate  that  there  are  cases  that  can 
be  pursued  under  current  law  in  U.S.  Courts.  We  encourage  enforcement  agencies 
and  attorneys  general  to  deploy  additional  resources  to  join  the  fight  against 
spyware. Companies need to understand that there will be costs associated with op-
erating in ways that deceive and defraud consumers. 

In addition to existing law, we at Webroot also anticipate benefits from legislation 
such  as  Senator  Burns’  bill,  S.  687.  The  bill  provides  additional  clarity  and  focus 
to  the  problems  we  are  seeing,  and  I  hope  it  will  induce  additional  attention  from 
enforcement agencies. 
Conclusion 

Again  I  thank  you  for  inviting  me  here  today.  Spyware  is  something  we  have 
spent  innumerable  hours  on  over  the  last  two  years,  and  I  appreciate  the  oppor-
tunity  to  come  and  share  with  you  some  of  what  we  have  learned.  I  welcome  any 
questions you have for me. 

I  would  also  like  to  offer  our  assistance  to  all  the  members  of  the  Committee.  If, 
after  today’s  hearing,  any  of  you  have  additional  questions  we  can  answer  or  need 
information we can provide, please do not hesitate to contact us. Based on our atten-
tion to this problem, and our unique research capability, we are in a unique position 
to  offer  assistance,  and  welcome  the  opportunity  to  help  in  the  formation  of  policy. 

Senator  BURNS.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Moll,  and  we  have 
Ari  Schwartz,  he  is  Associate  Director,  Center  for  Democracy  and 
Technology,  and  thank  you  for  coming  today,  we  work  a  lot  with 
that group, and we appreciate you and are looking forward to your 
testimony. 

STATEMENT OF ARI SCHWARTZ, ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR, 

CENTER FOR DEMOCRACY AND TECHNOLOGY (CDT) 

Mr. SCHWARTZ. Thank you, Senator Burns. members of the Com-
mittee, thank you for holding this hearing on spyware and inviting 
the Center for Democracy and Technology to testify today. 

Since  CDT  last  testified  in  front  of  this  committee  in  the  last 
Congress,  spyware  practices  have  gotten  much  worse.  On  a  per-
sonal note, following this holiday season, I can count myself among 
the  tens  of  thousands  of  technically  astute  consumers  and  com-
puter  professionals  who  have  tried  to  help  a  family  member  fix 
their  computer  that  has  been  plagued  by  spyware.  This  computer 
was  so  clogged  that  we  decided  it  would  be  better  just  too  simply 
reformat the hard drive. 

On the brighter side, we have seen law enforcement start to take 
action  against  alleged  spyware  purveyors.  Recently,  the  Attorney 
General  of  New  York  brought  a  case  against  a  Los  Angeles  com-
pany called Intermix for deceptive and unfair practices in installing 
software.  And  in  a  case  that  received  much  less  attention  in  Octo-
ber of last year, the FTC began its first public enforcement against 
a  spyware  company,  a  case  against  Seismic  Entertainment.  The 
FTC’s  lawsuit  was  based  on  a  complaint  filed  earlier  by  CDT.  In 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

that complaint, we specifically asked the FTC to investigate the af-
filiate relationships being exploited by companies to deflect respon-
sibility  and  avoid  accountability.  The  FTC  has  pursued  financial 
records  and  e-mails  in  that  case,  and  their  investigation  has  now 
given us a clear picture of how current advertising practices on the 
web can go astray and lead to the installation of spyware. 

There is little question that many consumers like the idea of free 
content in exchange for seeing advertisements, as long as it is their 
choice.  But  today  we  see  too  many  cases  of  long  affiliate  chains 
where,  at  the  end,  companies  are  paying  shady  operators  on  a  per 
installation  basis.  This  pay  per  install  model  creates  an  incentive 
to cram extra software onto computers without regard to the wish-
es of the user. 

The  FTC’s  discovery  in  the  Seismic  case  shows  through  e-mails 
that Seismic worked with various players to take advantage of the 
current  system.  CDT  has  tried  to  follow  the  resulting  trail.  In  our 
testimony,  we  have  a  graphic  detailing  what  we  know  about  this 
case  to  help  serve  as  an  example.  We  provided  the  Senators  with 
a one page blow up copy of this graphic. If you are confused by this 
trail,  you  are  not  alone.  The  complex  mess  of  advertisers,  adware 
companies,  ad  networks,  distributors,  affiliates  and  websites  is 
enough to make even a seasoned analyst’s head spin. 

To  clarify  a  little,  Seismic  would  use  fake  public  service  an-
nouncements to infect the computer through a hole in the browser. 
In  one  e-mail  message,  the  head  of  Seismic  proudly  proclaimed,  ‘‘I 
figured  out  a  way  to  install  an  executable  file  without  any  user 
interaction. This is the time to make the money while we can.’’ 

Later,  he  explained  to  one  of  his  partners  that  they  worked  on 
weekends because it takes longer for the ad networks to shut them 
down.  The  e-mails  also  show  a  pattern  that  they  would  go  back  to 
the  same  ad  networks  time  and  time  again.  Adware  networks 
should  have  caught  onto  this,  but  unfortunately  based  on  the  e- 
mail  available,  only  a  couple  seemed  to  care  about  this  clear  pat-
tern of abuse. 

Once  Seismic  had  gained  a  foothold  in  the  user’s  computer 
through  the  infected  banner,  it  would  install  the  dozens  of  pro-
grams,  including  those  from  large  companies,  like  180  Solutions. 
180  Solutions  software  then  delivered  popups  onto  the  user’s  com-
puter. As the LA Times detailed in a piece at the beginning of this 
week that Senator Wyden also mentioned, many of the mainstream 
companies have no idea that their ads are showing up on 180 Solu-
tions  software,  let  alone  through  nefarious  installations  like  this 
one. 

CDT  sees  four  major  areas  where  action  is  necessary  to  combat 
spyware,  and  stem  the  disturbing  trend  toward  a  loss  of  control 
and  transparency  for  Internet  users.  First,  enforcement  of  existing 
law.  Second,  better  consumer  education,  and  industry  self-regula-
tion.  Third,  improved  anti-spyware  technologies,  and  fourth,  base-
line  Internet  privacy  legislation.  Carefully  targeted  spyware-spe-
cific legislation may also have a role to play, especially as it relates 
to  improved  enforcement,  and  building  incentives  for  positive  ac-
tion. 

However,  we  hope  that  such  legislation  is  not  seen  as  an  alter-
native for baseline standards for online privacy. The absence of pri-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

vacy rules has created a kind of ‘‘wild west’’ atmosphere that we’ve 
seen  in  too  many  cases.  Privacy  legislation  can  put  in  place  a 
framework  for  addressing  issues  like  spyware  before  they’ve 
reached  epidemic  proportions,  rather  than  only  legislating  reac-
tively. 

CDT  believes  that  we  can  address  this  problem,  but  it  will  take 
a  sustained  commitment  from  technology  companies,  the  adver-
tising  community,  and  law  enforcement,  to  stem  these  bad  prac-
tices. I look forward to your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Schwartz follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ARI SCHWARTZ, ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR, 

CENTER FOR DEMOCRACY AND TECHNOLOGY (CDT) 

Chairman Stevens and Ranking Member Inouye, thank you for holding this hear-
ing  on  spyware,  an  issue  of  serious  concern  for  consumers  and  businesses  alike. 
CDT is honored to have the opportunity to speak with you today about spyware and 
the businesses behind it. 

CDT  is  a  non-profit,  public  interest  organization  devoted  to  promoting  privacy, 
civil  liberties,  and  democratic  values  online.  CDT  has  been  widely  recognized  as  a 
leader  in  the  policy  debate  surrounding  so-called  ‘‘spyware’’  applications.1 We  have 
been  engaged  in  the  legislative,  regulatory,  and  self-regulatory  efforts  to  deal  with 
the  spyware  problem,  and  have  been  active  in  public  education  efforts  through  the 
press and our own grassroots network. 

As  an  organization  dedicated  both  to  protecting  consumer  privacy  and  to  pre-
serving  openness  and  innovation  online,  CDT  has  sought  to  promote  responses  to 
the  spyware  epidemic  that  provide  meaningful  protection  for  users  while  avoiding 
overly  burdensome  regulation  of  online  commerce,  software  development,  and  busi-
ness models. Last year we testified before the Subcommittee on Communications on 
the issue of spyware, attempting to define the problem and suggest the range of re-
sponses  required  to  address  it.  Since  that  time,  we  have  worked  closely  with  mem-
bers  of  industry,  other  consumer  advocates,  legislators,  and  others  in  government 
to  more  fully  understand  and  begin  to  address  this  complex  and  important  issue. 
We  look  forward  to  continuing  this  effort  with  members  of  the  Committee  and  oth-
ers in Congress and elsewhere. 

‘‘I  figured  out  a  way  to  install  an  exe  without  any  user  interaction.  This  is  the 
time to make the $$$ while we can.’’ 2 

These  two  sentences,  the  body  of  an  e-mail  uncovered  by  the  FTC  in  its  recent 
case against a network of spyware purveyors, provide a rare window into the heart 
of  the  spyware  problem.  The  alarming  spread  of  deceptive  download  practices  and 
stealthy,  nefarious  applications  is  a  major  threat  to  Internet  users  and  to  the  long- 
term health of the open and decentralized Internet. It is a threat that exists because 
of the massive quantities of money to be made propagating these applications. San-
ford  Wallace,  the  spyware  purveyor  who  wrote  the  lines  above,  brought  in  at  least 

1 See,  e.g.,  CDT’s  ‘‘Campaign  Against  Spyware,’’  http://www.cdt.org/action/spyware/action 
(calling on users to report their problems with spyware to CDT; since November 2003, CDT has 
received  hundreds  of  responses).  Center  for  Democracy  &  Technology,  Complaint  and  Request 
for  Investigation,  Injunction,  and  Other  Relief,  in  the  Matter  of  MailWiper,  Inc.,  and  Seismic 
Entertainment  Productions,  Inc.,  Feb.  11,  2004,  available  at  http://www.cdt.org/privacy/ 
20040210cdt.pdf  [hereinafter  CDT  Complaint  Against  MailWiper  and  Seismic].  Eye  Spyware, 
Christian  Science  Monitor  Editorial,  Apr.  21,  2004  (‘‘Some  computer-focused  organizations,  like 
the Center for Democracy and Technology, are working to increase public awareness of spyware 
and  its  risks.’’).  The  Spies  in  Your  Computer,  N.Y.  Times  Editorial,  Feb.  18,  2004  (arguing  that 
‘‘Congress will miss the point [in spyware legislation] if it regulates specific varieties of spyware, 
only  to  watch  the  programs  mutate  into  forms  that  evade  narrowly  tailored  law.  A  better  solu-
tion,  as  proposed  recently  by  the  Center  for  Democracy  and  Technology,  is  to  develop  privacy 
standards  that  protect  computer  users  from  all  programs  that  covertly  collect  information  that 
rightfully  belongs  to  the  user.’’).  John  Borland,  Spyware  and  its  discontents,  CNET.com,  Feb. 
12,  2004  (‘‘In  the  past  few  months,  Ari  Schwartz  and  the  Washington,  D.C.-based  Center  for 
Democracy and Technology have leapt into the front ranks of the Net’s spyware-fighters.’’). 

2 Federal Trade Comm’n. Mem. in Support of Leave to Name Additional Def.’s. and File First 
Am.  Compl.,  Att.  A,  Federal  Trade  Comm’n  v.  Seismic  Entertainment  Productions,  Inc.,  et  al, 
04–377 (D. N.H.) [hereinafter FTC Mem.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

$1.5  million  from  browser  hijacking  and  deceptive  software  downloads  in  2003  and 
2004.3 

As  a  whole,  spyware  and  its  close  cousin  adware  are  a  multimillion  dollar  indus-
try.4 Deceptive  and  often  clearly  illegal  software  download  practices  are  a  regular 
part  of  the  business  of  many  American  companies  operating  in  online  commerce. 
These  practices  are  funded  and  incentivized  through  poorly  policed  download  com-
mission  programs,  programs  that,  in  turn,  are  funded  by  large,  mainstream  adver-
tisers. The entire process is sustained through a nearly impenetrable web of affiliate 
relationships  that  is  used  to  deflect  accountability  and  frustrate  law  enforcement. 
Many  of  the  companies  involved,  particularly  the  advertisers,  have  no  idea  what  is 
going on.5 

CDT sees four major areas where action is necessary to combat spyware and stem 
the  disturbing  trend  toward  a  loss  of  control  and  transparency  for  Internet  users: 
(1) enforcement of existing law; (2) better consumer education and industry self-reg-
ulation;  (3)  improved  anti-spyware  technologies;  and  (4)  baseline  Internet  privacy 
legislation. 

Carefully targeted, spyware specific legislation may also have a role to play. How-
ever, we hope that such legislation is not seen as an alternative for baseline stand-
ards for online privacy, now that many companies have expressed their support for 
such a goal. Privacy legislation would provide businesses with guidance about their 
responsibilities  as  they  deploy  new  technologies  and  business  models  that  involve 
the  collection  of  information.  It  would  put  in  place  a  framework  for  addressing 
issues  like  spyware  before  they  reach  epidemic  proportions,  rather  than  legislating 
reactively.  Finally,  privacy  assurances  in  law  would  give  consumers  some  measure 
of confidence that their privacy is protected as companies roll out new ventures. 

If we do not begin to think about privacy issues more comprehensively, the same 
players  will  be  back  in  front  of  this  committee  in  a  matter  of  months  to  address 
the  next  threat  to  online  privacy  and  user  control.  We  hope  that  we  can  address 
these  issue  up  front,  rather  than  waiting  for  each  new  privacy  threat  to  present 
itself. 
1. What is Spyware? 

No  precise  definition  of  spyware  exists.  The  term  has  been  applied  to  software 
ranging from ‘‘keystroke loggers’’ that capture every key typed on a particular com-
puter;  to  advertising  applications  that  track  users’  web  browsing;  to  programs  that 
hijack  users’  system  settings.  Much  attention  has  been  focused  on  the  surveillance 
dimension  of  the  spyware  issue,  though  the  problem  is  in  fact  much  broader  than 
that.6 

What the growing array of invasive programs known as ‘‘spyware’’ have in common 
is  a  lack  of  transparency  and  an  absence  of  respect  for  users’  ability  to  control  their 
own computers and Internet connections. 

In  this  regard,  these  programs  may  be  better  thought  of  as  trespassware.  Among 
the  host  of  objectionable  behaviors  for  which  such  nefarious  applications  can  be  re-
sponsible, are: 

• ‘‘browser hijacking’’ and other covert manipulation of users’ settings; 
• surreptitious installation, including through security holes; 
• actively  avoiding  uninstallation,  automatic  reinstallation,  and  otherwise  frus-
• substantially decreasing system performance and speed, in some cases sufficient 
• opening  security  backdoors  on  users’  computers  that  could  be  used  to  com-

trating users’ attempts to remove the programs; 

to render systems unusable; and 

promise their computers or the wider network. 

Each of these behaviors was specifically documented by CDT or reported to us by 
individual users frustrated by their inability to use their own systems. Although no 
single behavior of this kind defines ‘‘spyware,’’ together these practices characterize 

3 The  FTC  found  that  Wallace  received  nearly  $700,000  from  OptInTrade  and  over  $900,000 

from Mail Wiper, Inc. and Spy Deleter, Inc. (FTC Mem. at 7, 10). 

4 One recent article cites estimates between $500 milliion and $2 billion. We believe these esti-
mates are based on research by Esther Dyson and Webroot, respectively. See Joseph Menn, Big 
Firms’ Ad Bucks Also Fund Spyware, L.A. Times, May 9, 2005. 

5 See Menn, Big Firms’ Ad Bucks Also Fund Spyware. 
6 Some argue that the term ‘‘spyware’’ should be used exclusively for software that records and 
transmits consumer information, whereas the broader category of nefarious applications that we 
use the term to describe should instead be called ‘‘malware.’’ Regardless, the problem consumers 
face  is  the  same:  a  flood  of  unwanted  applications,  some  of  which  collect  information  and  some 
of which exhibit other objectionable behaviors. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

the  transparency  and  control  problems  common  to  applications  that  warrant  the 
‘‘spyware’’ moniker. 
2. The Spyware Business: Theory and Practice 

While  it  is  exceptionally  difficult  to  obtain  precise  data  on  the  prevalence  of  the 
spyware  problem,  the  best  study  done  to  date,  conducted  by  AOL  and  the  Nation 
CyberSecurity Alliance, found that 80% of broadband and dial-up users had adware 
or  spyware  programs  running  on  their  computers.7 Based  on  consumer  complaints 
we have received 8 and our own research, CDT believes that the prevalence of egre-
gious  spyware  and  clearly  unlawful  violations  has  increased  dramatically.  Of  par-
ticular concern is the use of security holes in web browsers to silently force software 
onto  users’  computers.  Many  Internet  users  may  simply  be  turning  off  the  Internet 
in response to these threats.9 

7 http://www.staysafeonline.info/news/safetylstudylv04.pdf 
8 When  CDT  first  became  involved  in  the  spyware  issue,  we  launched  a  ‘‘Campaign  Against 
Spyware,’’  calling  on  Internet  users  to  send  us  their  experiences  with  these  invasive  applica-
tions, as mentioned in footnote 1 above. We indicated that we would investigate the complaints 
received  and,  where  we  believed  appropriate,  file  complaints  with  the  FTC.  In  our  appearance 
before  the  Communications  Subcommittee,  we  testified  regarding  the  dramatic  response  to  our 
campaign.  In  the  nine  months  since  our  last  appearance,  CDT  has  continued  to  receive  com-
plaints  through  our  online  submission  form.  Among  what  are  now  hundreds  of  complaints,  a 
total  which  continues  to  grow  daily,  are  regular  reports  of  new  spyware  programs  arising.  See 
http://www.cdt.org/action/spyware 

9 See, e.g. Joseph Menn, No More Internet for Them, L.A. Times, Jan., 14, 2005, at A1. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
h
c
s
1
1
5

24 

At  the  heart  of  this  problem  is  the  affiliate-marketing  business  model  by  which 
many advertising applications (adware) are spread. We want to take the opportunity 
in our testimony today to highlight and explain this issue, which has not been given 
sufficient attention to date. 

Adware  companies  have  a  superficially  simple  business  model:  they  provide  a 
means  of  support  for  free  software  programs  similar  to  the  way  that  commercials 
support free television. Advertisers pay adware companies a fee to have their adver-
tisements  included  in  the  adware  program’s  rotation.  The  adware  company  then 
passes  on  a  portion  of  that  fee  to  distributors  in  exchange  for  bundling  the  adware 
program with other free software—such as gaming programs, screen savers, or peer- 
to-peer  applications.  Finally,  the  consumer  downloads  the  bundle,  agreeing  to  re-
ceive  the  advertising  served  by  the  adware  program  in  exchange  for  the  free  soft-
ware. 

In  fact,  this  simple  description  of  how  distribution  of  adware  and  other  bundled 
software  takes  place  is  often  a  radical  oversimplification.  Many  adware  companies 
and  other  software  bundlers  operate  through  much  more  complex  networks  of  affil-
iate  arrangements,  which  dilute  accountability,  frustrate  law  enforcement  efforts, 
and make it nearly impossible for consumers to understand what is going on. 

The diagram below presents some of the actors and relationships in the online ad-

vertising world as it operates in reality. These include: 

vertising brokers to distribute ads for their offerings; 

• product  and  service  vendors,  who  have  contracts  with  adware  vendors  and  ad-
• adware  companies,  who  have  multi-tier  affiliate  arrangements  with  other 
adware  companies,  software  producers,  website  owners,  and  advertising  bro-
kers; 
• software  makers  and  website  owners,  who  enter  into  bundling  and  distribution 
agreements  with  adware  companies  and  advertising  brokers,  as  well  as  with 
other software makers and website owners; and 
• advertising  brokers,  who  serve  as  middlemen  in  the  full  array  of  affiliate  ar-

rangements. 

The  consequence  of  ubiquitous  affiliate  arrangements  is  that  when  an  advertise-
ment  ends  up  on  a  user’s  computer,  it  will  be  many  steps  removed  from  the  adver-
tiser  who  paid  for  it.  Similarly,  the  installation  of  the  adware  that  is  causing  the 
ad may have been performed by a company that is far down the chain from the com-
pany that actually programmed the software. The existence of this complex network 
of  intermediaries  exacerbates  the  spyware  problem  in  several  ways.  For  example: 
• Industry Responsibility—Adware companies, advertising brokers, and others all 
often  disclaim  responsibility  for  deceptive  spyware  practices,  while  encouraging 
these behaviors through their affiliate schemes and doing little to police the net-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
3
h
c
s
1
1
5

25 

works  of  affiliates  acting  on  their  behalf.  Advertisers,  too,  should  be  pushed  to 
take greater responsibility for the companies they advertise with.10 

• Enforcement—Complex  webs  of  affiliate  relationships  obstruct  law  enforcement 
efforts  to  find  the  parties  responsible  for  spyware  outbreaks.  The  complexity  of 
these  cases  puts  an  extreme  strain  on  enforcement  agencies,  which  struggle  to 
tackle the problem with limited resources. 

• Consumer Notice—Adware companies and their affiliates have been reluctant to 
clearly  disclose  their  relationships  in  a  way  that  is  transparent  to  consumers. 
CDT  has  suggested  specific  ways  that  adware  companies  could  improve  brand-
ing  of  their  ads  to  help  consumers  understand  bundling  arrangements.11 For 
the  most  part,  companies  have  resisted  these  changes.12 Efforts  to  bring  trans-
parency  to  the  full  chain  of  affiliate  and  distribution  arrangements  have  met 
with even greater opposition. 

For  these  reasons,  the  affiliate  issue  has  become  a  central  aspect  of  the  spyware 
epidemic.  Finding  ways  to  effectively  reform  affiliate  relationships  will  remove  a 
linchpin of spyware purveyors’ operations. 
3. A Real World Example of the Spyware Business 

In October of last year, the FTC began the first public enforcement action against 
purveyors of spyware, a case against Sanford Wallace and his New Hampshire com-
pany  Seismic  Entertainment.13 The  FTC’s  lawsuit  was  based  on  a  complaint  filed 
earlier  by  CDT.  In  that  complaint,  we  specifically  asked  the  Commission  to  inves-
tigate  the  affiliate  relationships  between  the  parties  involved.  We  highlighted  the 
problem  of  affiliate  relationship  being  ‘‘exploited  by  companies  to  deflect  responsi-
bility  and  avoid  accountability.’’ 14 The  FTC  pursued  financial  records  and  e-mails 
in the case, and its investigation has now given us a clear picture of how the adware 
business model can go very wrong. 

The  facts  in  the  Seismic  case,  from  the  consumer’s  perspective,  were  as  follows: 
An  Internet  user  browsing  the  web  would  go  to  any  of  a  variety  of  online  sports, 
gaming, or other sites that carried banner advertising. The user would see an innoc-
uous seeming banner advertisement, often a public service ad. Unbeknownst to him, 
however,  the  banner  contained  code  that  would  launch  pop-ups  and  change  his 
homepage.  The  pop-ups  and  homepage  hijacking  were  triggered  when  the  banner 
was  loaded,  whether  or  not  the  user  clicked  on  it.  The  next  time  the  user  opened 
his browser, he would be directed to a full page advertisement for anti-spyware soft-
ware. This offer to remove unwanted programs and pop-ups (for $30) would appear 
even  as  adware  programs  were  being  silently  installed  on  the  user’s  computer. 
These  programs  would  cause  a  barrage  of  pop-ups  whenever  the  user  surfed  the 
web,  they  would  add  a  toolbar  and  new  ‘‘favorites’’  to  his  browser,  and  they  would 
deposit icons on his desktop. 

10 Examples  of  steps  in  this  direction  include  public  policies  by  Dell,  Major  League  Baseball, 
and  Verizon  setting  standards  for  what  software  companies  they  will  advertise  with.  Similarly, 
Google  has  drafted  a  specific  public  policy  on  what  other  applications  it  will  bundle  its  utilities 
with. See http://www.google.com/corporate/softwarelprinciples.html. 

11 Center  for  Democracy  &  Technology,  Comments  to  FTC  Workshop  on  File-Sharing  Work-

shop, Nov. 15, 2004. 

12 WhenU,  one  of  the  large  adware  companies,  recently  introduced  co-branding  for  some  ads. 

WhenU is currently the only adware company to co-brand. 

13 Federal  Trade  Comm’n  v.  Seismic  Entertainment  Productions,  Inc.,  et  al,  04–377  (D.  N.H.) 
14 CDT Complaint Against MailWiper and Seismic at 2. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

CDT  traced  the  nefarious  banner  ads  that  triggered  this  whole  chain  of  events 
back  to  Seismic  Entertainment.  Based  on  CDT’s  research  and  the  FTC’s  discovery, 
we now have a partial picture of what was happening behind the scenes in the case. 
Our  current  understanding  of  the  network  of  affiliate  arrangements  is  illustrated 
above—a map that would be confusing even to many of the companies in it. 
A. Placing the Spyware-Spreading Ads 

Once  Seismic  developed  code  to  change  users  homepages  and  stealthily  install 
programs,  the  company  had  to  find  a  way  to  place  this  code  in  websites  viewed  by 
large  numbers  of  Internet  users.  To  do  this,  Seismic  incorporated  the  code  into  in-
nocuous  seeming  banner  ads,  often  public  interest  ads  as  described  above.  Seismic 
would then pay large advertising brokers to incorporate the ads into their rotations. 
In  the  cases  we  know  of,  this  was  accomplished  through  a  bait  and  switch:  the  ad 
brokers would be shown one set of normal, uninfected ads. Then at the last minute 
(and  often  over  the  weekend  in  order  to  make  detection  more  difficult)  the  benign 
ad would be switched with one that looked superficially identical, but contained the 
infectious  spyware  code.  In  this  way,  the  infected  ads  would  appear  on  sites  that 
had  agreements  with  the  ad  network,  whether  sports  sites,  gaming  sites,  or  other 
popular online destinations that used ad revenue to support their services. 

Often  Seismic  would  use  a  ‘‘front  man’’  to  further  obfuscate  the  situation.  We 
know  that  soon  after  Seismic  figured  out  how  to  silently  install  applications,  the 
company contacted a prospective partner, OptInTrade: 

From: <MasterWebFanClub@aol.com> 
To: jared@optintrade.com 
Date: Sat, Mar–6–2004 4:51 PM 
Subject: I DID IT 
I  figured  out  a  way  to  install  an  exe  without  any  user  interaction.  This  is  the 
time to make the $$$ while we can. 

Seismic and OptInTrade agreed that OptInTrade would deal with the advertising 
networks.  When  the  networks  discovered  that  the  benign  advertisements  they  had 
approved  had  been  replaced  by  malicious  versions,  OptInTrade  would  feign  igno-
rance and lay the blame on its upstream affiliate. In exchange for playing this role, 
OptInTrade would receive a portion of Seismic’s revenues from the scheme. One ex-
change  between  Seismic  and  OptInTrade,  laying  out  this  strategy,  was  uncovered 
by the FTC: 

From: <MasterWebFanClub@aol.com> 
To: jared@optintrade.com 
Date: Fri, Nov–28–2003 12:37 PM 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
h
c
s
1
1
5

27 

Subject: strategy 
I  do  my  sneaky  shit  with  adv.com  today  through  Sunday—everyone’s  off  any-
way. . . . You then send an e-mail to your contact early Monday AM saying the 
advertiser was unethical and pulled a switch and you are no longer doing busi-
ness  with  them.  . . .  Then  we  stop  buying  adv.com  through  you  in  any  way. 
We  know  from  other  e-mails  that  this  strategy  was  in  fact  carried  out.  One  ad 
network,  a  company  called  CyDoor,  complained  to  OptInTrade  about  the  spyware 
infected ads that it had placed: 

From: Bob Regular [mailto:bob@cydoor.com] 
Sent: Sunday, December 21, 2003 12:45 PM 
To: ‘‘Jared Lansky’’ 
Subject:  Please  Terminate  OptinTrade  Online  Pharmacy—Violated  Agreementt 
[ . . . ]  traffic  just  informed  me  your  launching  pops  from  your  banners  that 
force change in you homepage and stall your computer [ . . . ] I simply do not 
understand how this could happen again. 

In  response,  OptInTrade  told  CyDoor  that  the  ads  were  ‘‘from  a  new  advertiser’’ 

and that they had ‘‘no idea how this is happening:’’ 

From: Jared Lansky [mailto:jared@optintrade.com] 
Sent: Sunday, December 21, 2003 9:25 PM 
To: Bob Regular 
Subject:  RE:  Please  Terminate  OptinTrade  Online  Pharmacy—Violated  Agree-
ment 
Hi  Bob—The  pharmacy  campaign  was  a  new  advertiser  with  a  new  code  set. 
When  tested  it  didn’t  launch  pops  or  change  my  homepage  so  I  approved  it  to 
run with you. I have no idea how this is happening [ . . . ] 

In fact, OptInTrade knew exactly what was going on. 

B. Sources of Funding: Adware Companies and Advertisers 

Seismic’s  infected  banners  made  the  company  a  surprising  amount  of  money. 
Seismic’s  revenues  came  largely  from  per-install  commissions  paid  by  the  adware 
companies.  These  companies  pay  a  set  amount  every  time  one  of  their  affiliates  in-
stalls  their  program.  Seismic  would  install  the  adware  applications  through  its 
stealth process, and then collect the commissions—hundreds of thousands of dollars 
worth, based on documents uncovered by the FTC. 

We  know  from  records  uncovered  by  the  FTC  and  from  CDT’s  own  research  that 
the long list of companies involved in the distribution chain for the adware applica-
tions  installed  by  Seismic  included  LoudMarketing,15 Integrated  Search  Tech-
nologies,  ClearSearch,  Mindset  Interactive,  and  180  Solutions.  We  do  not  yet  know 
the  exact  nature  of  these  companies’  involvement  or  their  level  of  knowledge  about 
the scheme. 

We do know, however, that in at least one case, the support for the adware came 
originally  from  major  online  companies.  180  Solutions  is  paid  by  large  travel  sites, 
online  merchants,  and  others  to  serve  advertisements  for  their  services.16 In  this 
case,  a  portion  of  those  revenues  were  passed  on  to  a  180  Solutions  distributor, 
Mindset  Interactive.  That  company,  either  directly  or  through  other  affiliates,  paid 
Seismic  for  installations—installations  that  Seismic  would  get  through  its  devious 
infected banner ads. 

In  this  way,  large  legitimate  companies  came  to  fund  clearly  illegal  spyware  dis-
tribution  practices.  Because  of  the  lengthy  and  complex  chain  of  affiliates  involved, 
they almost certainly did so unintentionally and unknowingly. 
4. Combating Spyware 

Combating spyware—and the affiliate problems behind it—requires a combination 
of  aggressive  law  enforcement,  private  efforts,  and  legislation.  Significant  progress 
has already been made since the spyware issue first began to receive national atten-
tion over a year ago, but much ground still remains. 

15 LoudMarketing,  a  Canadian  company  also  known  as  LoudCash,  CDT  Inc.  (no  relation  to 
the  Center  for  Democracy  and  Technology),  and  a  host  of  other  names,  was  recently  purchased 
by 180 Solutions. 

16 The two examples used in our chart, J.P. Morgan Chase and Disney, are taken from Menn, 
Big Firms’ Ad Bucks Also Fund Spyware. We do not know conclusively (and it would be nearly 
impossible to determine) whether these two companies were advertising with 180 Solutions dur-
ing the precise time that 180 Solutions’ products were being covertly installed through Seismic. 
Rather, they are intended to serve primarily as examples of the many large, mainstream compa-
nies that advertise through adware. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A. Law enforcement 

28 

Much  spyware  is  currently  covered  by  Section  5  of  the  FTC  Act,  banning  unfair 
and  deceptive  trade  practices,  as  well  as  by  the  Computer  Fraud  and  Abuse  Act  or 
the  Electronic  Communications  Privacy  Act.  Spyware  purveyors  are  also  likely  vio-
lating a variety of state statutes. 

The FTC’s case against Seismic et al., described in detail above, represents an ad-
mirable  first  step  in  the  enforcement  effort.  We  applaud  the  Commission  for  its 
work  on  the  case,  which  has  led  to  an  injunction  against  further  exploitative  prac-
tices  by  Seismic,  and  the  extensive  discovery  regarding  Seismic’s  affiliates  that  we 
have  described.  We  hope  and  expect  that  the  Commission  will  continue  to  pursue 
the web of affiliates in this case and to add defendants as appropriate. 

In  addition,  the  Attorney  General  of  New  York  recently  brought  a  case  against 
an  L.A.-based  company,  Intermix  Media,  alleging  that  the  company  had  installed  a 
wide  range  of  advertising  software  on  home  computers  without  giving  consumers 
proper  notice.17 CDT  applauds  the  Attorney  General’s  action,  as  state  enforcement 
is badly needed in this area to supplement Federal cases. 

Indeed, both the FTC and other national and state level law enforcement agencies 
must  actively  pursue  further  cases.  Both  the  number  and  frequency  of  cases  must 
be dramatically increased if law enforcement is to provide a significant deterrent to 
purveyors of spyware and to serve as a wake-up call to the many upstream compa-
nies that are currently partnering with and funding these bad actors. 
B. Self Regulation and Consumer Education 

Consumer education and sound best practices for downloadable software are sore-
ly needed. Consumer protection bodies have a crucial role to play in educating con-
sumers. 

In addition, CDT has been contacting advertisers that are the root source of fund-
ing for spyware. We are encouraging advertisers to take a hard look at their policies 
and affiliate agreements. Companies should be actively creating and endorsing qual-
ity  control  policies  for  advertising  delivery,  and  they  should  refuse  to  partner  with 
adware  companies  until  those  companies  clean  up  their  acts,  ensuring  that  all  the 
users who get their ads have consented to receive them. 
C. Anti-Spyware Technologies 

Spyware  blocking  and  removal  tools,  and  other  innovative  forms  of  anti-spyware 

technology, are a crucial component of consumers’ spyware protection. 

In  order  to  help  advance  anti-spyware  technology,  CDT  convened  a  meeting  in 
March  with  industry  leaders  and  others  to  discuss  issues  facing  the  anti-spyware 
industry,  including  those  that  impact  the  industry’s  ability  to  ensure  user  control 
and  empowerment.  The  participants  shared  their  commitment  to  ensuring  that 
users  maintain  control  over  what  is  on  their  computers.  The  participants  also 
agreed  to  work  together  to  better  educate  consumers  about  available  tools  and  to 
develop  shared  terminology  and  approaches.  Participants  included:  Aluria;  AOL; 
Computer  Associates;  EarthLink;  HP;  Lavasoft;  McAfee  Inc.;  Microsoft;  Safer-Net-
working  Ltd.;  Symantec;  Trend  Micro;  Webroot  Software;  Yahoo!  Inc.;  Samuelson 
Law,  Technology  &  Public  Policy  Clinic  at  Boalt  Hall  School  of  Law,  UC  Berkeley; 
Business Software Alliance; and the Cyber Security Industry Alliance. 

The  group  plans  to  meet  again  and  will  invite  other  consumer  groups  to  join  the 
effort  as  the  members  create  public  working  drafts  that  address  the  group’s  chief 
goal of helping users and organizations take back control of their computers. 
D. Legislation 

CDT  has  been  supportive  of  legislative  efforts  against  spyware,  yet  we  also  want 
to  make  clear  that  there  is  only  so  much  that  new  legislation  can  do.  We  endorse 
the  idea  of  calling  specific  attention  to  the  worst  types  of  deceptive  software  prac-
tices online as most of the spyware bills do. Enforcement will be crucial to any legis-
lative  effort.  Therefore,  we  are  strongly  supportive  of  including  powers  for  state  at-
torneys  general.  In  addition,  any  legislation  must  take  care  to  ensure  that  the  use 
of complex affiliate relationships, as outlined above, will not enable responsible par-
ties to avoid liability. 

Senator  Conrad  Burns  (R–MT),  Senator  Barbara  Boxer  (D–CA)  and  Senator  Ron 
Wyden (D–OR), should be commended for their leadership to accomplish these goals 
through the new version of the SPYBLOCK Act (S.687). It marks a substantial step 
forward in addressing many of the concerns of consumer groups and companies. 

CDT  also  remains  firmly  committed  to  the  idea  that  a  long-term  solution  to 
spyware and other similar issues requires baseline online privacy legislation. Many 

17 See http://www.oag.state.ny.us/press/2005/apr/apr28al05.html. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

of the issues raised by spyware may be easier to deal with in this context. This ap-
proach will also help us head off similar epidemics in the future, rather than react-
ing to them legislatively only after the fact. 

Indeed,  CDT  hopes  that  the  current  effort  on  spyware  can  provide  a  jumping  off 
point for efforts to craft baseline standards for online privacy now that many compa-
nies have expressed their support for such a goal. Otherwise, we will simply be back 
in this same place when we confront the next privacy-invasive technology. 
5. Conclusion 

Users  should  have  control  over  what  programs  are  installed  on  their  computers 
and  over  how  their  Internet  connections  are  used.  They  should  be  able  to  rely  on 
a  predictable  web-browsing  experience  and  the  ability  to  determine  what  programs 
are on their computer and to keep out those they do not want. The widespread pro-
liferation of invasive software applications takes away this control. 

Addressing  the  spyware  problem  at  its  root  requires  understanding  and  respond-
ing  to  the  problem  of  affiliate  marketing.  Industry  self-policing  and  aggressive  law 
enforcement  by  Federal  and  State  authorities  can  help  combat  this  phenomenon. 
Continued consumer education, and improved anti-spyware tools are also key to giv-
ing  consumers  control  back  over  their  online  experiences.  New  laws,  if  carefully 
crafted, may also have a role to play. 

The potential of the Internet will be substantially harmed if the current spyware 
epidemic continues. We look forward to continued work with this Committee to find 
creative ways to address this problem through law, technology, public education and 
industry initiatives. 

Senator BURNS. Thank you very much, Mr. Schwartz. I will start 
the  questioning  here,  and  I  will  start  with  you  because  you  men-
tioned  this  thing  of  the  need  of  more  privacy  legislation.  Are  you 
saying  that  we  should  go  back  and  reexamine  the  old  Privacy  Act 
and make some changes now because technology has changed? 

Mr.  SCHWARTZ.  Yes,  that’s  exactly  what  I’m  saying.  We  need  to 
take a look; you know we’ve had issues of cookies come before this 
committee,  6  or  7  years  ago.  Spam  has  come  up  again  and  again; 
we’ve  had  this  discussion,  as  Senator  Nelson  said,  with  the  data 
brokers and some of those issues as they reach online. We have the 
issue of RFID chips, and all of these come up again and again, and 
we don’t have the basic framework online to deal with these issues 
and  how  they  relate  to  the  Internet.  And  that  causes  us  to  have 
to  go  and  reexamine  these  problems  every  time,  reexamine  notice, 
reexamine consent, reexamine choices. 

Some  companies  are  beginning  to  come  around  to  the  idea  that 
today,  they’re  beginning  to  come  around  to  the  idea  that  privacy 
legislation  could  actually  help  in  the  future  if  it’s  done  right.  And 
it’s  going  to  be  hard  to  do  it  right,  and  we  see  that,  and  we’re  not 
necessarily  saying  that  it  should  be  done  only  to  go  after  spyware. 
We think it should be a bigger discussion, but we need to reinvigo-
rate that debate again. 

Senator  BURNS.  Mr.  Moll,  how  would  you  react  to  that  because 
you are in that business, and it seems to me there’s a very fine line 
here  that  makes  policymakers,  and  especially  when  you  set  any-
thing  into  law,  are  we  going  to  have  to  change  as  technology 
changes, but how do we deal with that? 

Mr.  MOLL.  I  think  there  are  some  principles  that  are  timeless, 
and  I  point  back  to  the  Fair  Information  Practice  principles  that 
the FTC rolled out in the 1990s as still being, in fact, timeless and 
highly  relevant.  I  do  think  that  as  technology  continues  to  morph, 
(and I’ll point out that today we are talking about PCs, we are not 
talking  about  PDAs  and  cell  phones,  and  spyware  and  privacy 
threats  will  ultimately  govern  those  devices  as  well),  there  needs 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

to be a constant vigilance around how this is going to apply to new 
technologies. 

Senator  BURNS.  Mr.  Hughes,  advertising  is  very,  very  important 
to  all  of  us.  That’s  what  maintains  our  free  over-the-air  television 
and  radio  and  it  also  provides  the  engine  that  allows  us  to  be  on 
many of our Internet services for a very, very low cost. In your tes-
timony  you  are  saying  move  with  caution.  Have  you  provided  this 
committee,  and  I  know  we  have  been  working  with  you  a  little  bit 
on this, that’s a fine line also. 

Mr.  HUGHES.  It’s  mostly  definitely  a  fine  line.  But  actually,  I 
would  say  that  we  should  not  move  with  caution,  we  should  actu-
ally  move  with  purpose  and  actually  move  aggressively.  We  have 
had  the  opportunity  to  review  Senator  Allen’s  proposal,  we  think 
that it has many of the components that we feel are important and 
right. 

What  we  have  seen  in  the  spam  debate  is  that  strong  enforce-
ment  has  an  incredible  deterrent  effect  in  the  market  place.  I  fre-
quently  say  that  we  will  solve  the  spam  problem  and  I  think  we’ll 
solve  the  spyware  problem  when  we  see  more  purveyors  of  this 
fraud  and  deception  coming  out  of  Federal  courthouses  with  rain-
coats  over  their  heads,  being  led  away.  I  think  that  that  deterrent 
effect is absolutely necessary. 

So  legislation  that  focuses  on  fraud  and  deception  provides  pre-
emptive standards so that we have a national level, a national plat-
form  for  legitimate  business  to  comply  with  and  work  from,  and 
strong enforcement tools, I think would be something that we need 
immediately. 

Senator BURNS. Can we stay ahead of it? 
Mr.  HUGHES.  I  think  we  are  too  far  behind  it  right  now  to  get 
ahead  of  it.  I  can  foresee  a  future,  sort  of  between  those  two 
dystopian visions that I described in which we do have control over 
it,  and  let  me  again  refer  back  to  the  spam  debate.  Two  years  ago 
many  were  ready  to  throw  their  hands  in  the  air  and  say  that  e- 
mail  was  a  lost  cause.  That  the  channel  of  e-mail  had  indeed  be-
come so polluted. And, in fact, legitimate businesses were seeing e- 
mail filtering for spam filtering, some of the Bazian filters, content 
word filters, flagging messages that were entirely innocent, in fact, 
legitimate, and in some cases, absolutely necessary that the recipi-
ent received them. We were in a bad state, but we got a great com-
bination  of  the  CAN–SPAM  Act,  strong  technological  responses  in-
cluding e-mail authentication which is moving forward aggressively 
now, and AOL recently had given us some very good news, that we 
may  be  turning  the  corner  in  the  spam  fight.  So,  I  most  definitely 
can foresee a future when we turn the corner on the spyware fight. 
Senator  BURNS.  Government  can  do  some,  we  as  policymakers 
can  pass  a  law,  but  I  think  it  takes,  and  you  tell  me  if  I’m  wrong, 
it  takes  all  the  industries  that  all  three  of  you  represent,  working 
together  because  there’s  no  way  we  can  be  agile  enough—the  only 
thing  we  can  set  up  is  the  framework—but  I  think  most  of  the  re-
sponsibility  falls  on  you  folks  who  represent  the  different  ends  of 
industry. 

Mr. HUGHES. Senator, if I could, we actually scheduled our meet-
ing  first,  but  tomorrow  we  have  almost  two  hundred  members  of 
this industry, including Mr. Schwartz and representatives from Mr. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

Moll’s  company,  meeting  in  New  York  City  to  do  exactly  that.  To 
move  the  discussion  in  the  dialogue  forward.  So  I  am  looking  for-
ward  to  hosting  200  of  our  colleagues  who  care  desperately  about 
this issue tomorrow in New York City. 

Senator  BURNS.  You  should  have  met  in  Billings,  Montana,  but 

other than that, that’s fine. Mr. Allen? 

Senator ALLEN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I will ask all the wit-
nesses  here  these  questions.  Do  you  all  believe  that  the  FTC  cur-
rently  has  the  authority  to  bring  action  against  those  who  are 
purveying  these  deceptive  and  fraudulent  means  of  surreptitiously 
downloading  software  on  consumers’  computers?  Do  you  all  think 
they have the authority? 

Mr. SCHWARTZ. Yes, they have the authority and they have tools 
to  do  it.  We’re  concerned  about,  as  you  said,  some  of  the 
disgorgement  issues  and  some  of  the—being  able  to  go  down  the 
chain  a  little  bit  further—and  whether  they  have  the  resources  to 
bring those cases. 

Senator ALLEN. Do you all agree? 
Mr.  MOLL.  Senator,  I  would  add  one  element,  and  that  is  that 
the  Internet,  and  the  notion  of  click-through  licenses  create  new 
elements  that  I  don’t  think  were  embodied  in  many  of  the  laws, 
both at the State and Federal level that govern fair advertising. So 
in as much as they may have authority, I think there may be ques-
tions of application. 

Senator ALLEN. Let me understand that again? 
Mr. MOLL. Well, I think that there are elements today contained 
in  end  user  license  agreements  that  suggest  that  the  user  has 
given  permission  to  install  software  that  plays  ads.  And  I  think 
that the notion of that click-through license is at the heart of some 
of  the  adware  debate  that  will  be  part  of  the  spyware  debate  we 
are going to have to facilitate here. 

Senator  ALLEN.  Would  that  not  be  a  fraudulent  and  deceptive 

practice? 

Mr. MOLL. That, I think, is up for question, and my belief is ab-

solutely. I think there are others who disagree. 

Senator ALLEN. Mr. Hughes? 
Mr.  HUGHES.  Senator,  I  would  concur,  I  think  the  FTC  Act  pro-
vides great tools for the FTC to go after the purveyors of spyware. 
There  are  a  couple  of  components  that  I  think  would  be  helpful, 
disgorgement, clearly, but also preemption. We work in a medium, 
the web that is fundamentally borderless, and for a legitimate busi-
ness  to  try  and  draw  lines  around  state  boundaries  and  comply 
with  differing  state  standards  is  a  real  challenge.  I  think  the  web 
really lends itself to a jurisdiction of the highest level and therefore 
we are supportive of Federal preemptive legislation. 

Senator  ALLEN.  I  call  it  a  national  standard,  and  the  reason  is 
that we do have a number of states acting, and you can understand 
why  states  are  acting,  but  this  is  a  national—it’s  indeed  an  inter-
national problem. And the approach I think we are taking, my bill 
as  well  as  Senator  Burns’  bill,  different  than  the  house  version  is 
that  we  do  allow,  obviously,  the  FTC  and  Federal  authorities  to 
prosecute these criminal activities. In the event that the states’ at-
torneys  general  want  to  be  involved,  they  also  can,  and  both  of  us 
have that whereas the House version does not. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

The impetus, all of you all agree that there’s Federal jurisdiction, 
Federal  authority.  Do  you  agree  that  the  main  problem,  problems, 
are  one,  they  don’t  have  the  resources  to  investigate  and  pros-
ecute—and so in our measure, the measure that Senator Smith and 
Ensign  and  I  have  introduced  adds  $10  million  in  funding,  the 
disgorgement aspects of getting after ill-gotten gains. Ultimately, I 
think one way to fund it is to treat them somewhat similar to what 
I  have  done  in  the  past  with  drug  dealers,  if  they  have  ill-gotten 
gains off those assets, the jewelry, art object, yachts, cars, and give 
it to law enforcement for them to make undercover drug buys, pay 
informants,  and  so  forth.  It’s  like  catching  a  shark  and  cutting  it 
up  for  bait  to  catch  more  sharks,  as  opposed  to  the  taxpayers. 
Those are the main approaches, as well, I think, the need for those 
in  the  industry  to  find  ways  to  educate  the  public,  consumers  at 
home or in businesses how there are technologies to block spyware, 
just as was done with spam more recently. 

Do  you  think  that  adding  $10  million  to  their  enforcement  ef-
forts, as well as discouragement would have that salutary effect of 
deterring, as well as, do you all agree that there ought to be a na-
tional standard here, as opposed to—I see them all nodding yes for 
the record for this court reporter, do any of you disagree? 

Mr. SCHWARTZ. Senator, can I? 
Senator ALLEN. Yes. 
Mr.  SCHWARTZ.  One  issue  that  you  just  raised  there  about  some 
of the funding issues, I think it’s important to realize that you can 
look  at  that  chart  that  we  put  together  of  the  Seismic  case,  and 
mapping  that  case  out  takes  a  lot  of  resources  just  to  get  to  the 
point of finding the chain and tracking down the chain. They need 
the kind of forensic resources at the FTC and at the state level, ac-
tually,  to  be  able  to  go  after  these  bad  guys  all  the  way  down  the 
chain. That’s something we don’t really have today. In the Seismic 
case,  we  were  able  to  spend  our  own  money  and  work  with  others 
on  the  net  to  try  and  do  the  forensic  work  that  put  out  the  basic 
outline of the chain, so that we could turn it over to the FTC, and 
then they could pick it up from there. 

The Intermix Case is a more direct case than we usually see, the 
one  that  Attorney  General  Spitzer’s  bringing,  so  we’re  talking,  to 
get  really  to  the  root  of  the  problem  it’s  going  to  take  more  re-
sources  and  kind  of  new  skills  to  some  of  these  law  enforcement 
agencies that they perhaps don’t have today. 

Senator  ALLEN.  That’s  good  advice.  I’m  not  sure  if  $10  million 
dollars  is  all  that  it  takes,  but  it’s  a  substantial  amount  of  money. 
It’s  not  as  if  this  is  an  easy  effort  that  people  instinctively  know 
how to investigate. 

Let me finish in the last minute here. On the issue of a national 
standard would you all agree in the need for preemption that if we 
don’t  have  that,  you  could  have  50  different  state  standards  for 
this,  as  well  as  the  global  marketplace  and  actually,  then  have 
such a confusing situation, it would actually harm the ability of us 
to prosecute nationally and internationally? 

Mr.  MOLL.  Senator,  if  I  may,  I  think  you’ve  hit  on  a  very  good 
point  there.  And  to  the  point  that  we  want  to  defend  the  adver-
tising  industry  that  is  legitimate,  I  think  that  is  the  most  key  ele-
ment right now. With the current trajectory of state laws that vary 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

in  their  application  and  definition  as  widely  as  they  do  (and  I’ll 
point  out,  there  are  27  states  that  have  a  bill  either  passed,  or 
somewhere in process) this becomes untenable for people to thwart 
the  problem,  as  we  do  in  the  anti-spyware  industry  and  for  people 
in the advertising business, for advertisers themselves. 

Further,  I  think  that  on  the  international  level,  the  EU  is  cur-
rently  in  consideration  of  legislation  which  will  obviously  provide 
for  some  consistency  there.  So  I  think  that  we’d  be  in  good  stead 
to follow suit and have a national standard. 

Senator  ALLEN.  That’s  good  to  know,  I  will  be  holding  a  hearing 
this afternoon, Mr. Chairman, EU, European Commission and U.S. 
technology  issues,  and  this  would  be  a  good  one.  Let  me  point  out 
our  measure  that  we  have  introduced  has  the  toughest  penalties 
than  any  state  has.  I  wanted  to  make  it  so  we  are  not  somehow 
having  lower  penalties.  We  have  tougher  penalties  than  any  other 
state as well as allowing treble penalties, and damages as well. 

Senator BURNS. Senator Nelson? 
Senator  NELSON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  If  we  don’t  put  an 
end  to  spyware,  spam,  and  identity  theft,  people  are  going  to  be 
gun  shy  about  using  their  computer.  I  couldn’t  help  but  think  of  a 
thorny issue that we have coming before us by the end of this year 
which is the reenactment of U.S.A. Patriot Act. And one of the ex-
cesses  that  is  considered  there  is  that  the  government  may  go  in, 
without  a  court  order,  and  get  your  library  records  to  see  what 
kind  of  books  you  have  been  reading.  If  we  don’t  do  something 
about  this,  someone  can  invade  our  personal  computers  and  find 
out  what  we  have  been  reading.  So,  it’s  the  same  kind  of  thing  of 
invasion  of  personal  privacy  which  is  so  important  under  this  con-
stitutional form of government, and under the Bill of Rights. 

Now,  I  can  tell  you  that  my  constituents  are  telling  me,  Mr. 
Hughes,  that  the  spam  problem  is  not  solved.  To  the  contrary,  we 
better  put  an  end  to  spam,  and  we  better  put  an  end  to  spyware. 
It’s  not  only  the  problem  that  we  don’t  have  enough  teeth  in  the 
anti-spam law, but that the perpetrator just moves offshore. So, as 
we  address  this  issue  of  spyware  we  have  to  address  the  same 
thing.  Put  some  teeth  in  the  law  so  that  they  can  come  out  with 
jackets  over  their  head  and  be  an  example,  but  that’s  not  going  to 
happen if they all move offshore just like so much of the spam has, 
as  well.  So  we  are  going  to  have  to  do  something  that  has  U.S. 
Government  partnering  with  other  countries  to  get  our  arms 
around this situation. 

So  let  me  ask  you  Mr.  Moll,  in  your  testimony  you  mentioned 
that spyware poses the threats to data security, which in turn, can 
harm our national security, elaborate on that a little bit. 

Mr. MOLL. Certainly, Senator. We define spyware as inclusive of 
several sub-categories. Two of the more alarming include keystroke 
loggers and Trojans. 

Key  stroke  loggers  are  simply  software  applications  which  have 
the  ability  to  capture  every  key  stroke  you  type  at  the  keyboard. 
Products  like  this  were  recently  used  in  an  international  example 
that,  I  think,  highlights  how  effective  they  can  be.  Sumitomo 
Mitsui  Bank’s  London  offices  were  actually  alleviated  of  $430  mil-
lion in a situation where keystroke loggers were used to steal pass-
words,  user  names,  and  account  numbers.  And,  this  is  a  situation 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

that  I  think  is  highly  relevant  as  it  relates  to  national  security.  I 
already mentioned Hill Air Force Base. We have several Air Force, 
Navy,  and  Army  installations  that  use  our  products  to  defend 
against this very kind of threat—installation of a key stroke logger 
on a system which has access to critical security information. 

I would point out further that the existence of firewalls, intrusion 
prevention capabilities, and anti-virus capabilities today is not suf-
ficient to defend against this kind of threat, and as a result, we ef-
fectively  have  offered  low-hanging  fruit  and  access  to  these  kinds 
of systems through things like key stroke loggers. 

The example that I offered about the Oklahoma City Sheriff’s of-
fice  in  Kentucky,  I  think  is  a  good  one  because  the  software  in 
question  that  was  used  and  found  to  be  on  those  machines  is  a 
commercially  available  product  for  $99.00,  you  can  purchase  this 
product.  If  you  purchase  the  upgrade  you  can  actually  create  your 
own  installer,  which  would  allow  you  to  say,  create  a  document 
that  you  could  send  by  e-mail,  and  if  somebody  viewed  the  docu-
ment,  it  would  silently  install  the  software  on  that  PC.  That  kind 
of capability, I think, is a great threat to our security. 

Mr.  SCHWARTZ.  Let  me  say,  what  Mr.  Moll  says  is  illegal  today 
under  the  Computer  Fraud  and  Abuse  Act.  A  protected  computer 
under  the  Computer  Fraud  and  Abuse  Act  includes  a  computer 
that  holds  national  security  information  within  the  Government. 
Under  any  standard.  The  Department  of  Justice  could  be  bringing 
these cases today. We have not seen them enforced in that way. 

Senator  BURNS.  Mr.  Schwartz,  what  would  you  like  in  a  com-
prehensive  approach  to  this,  since  we’re  talking  about  national  se-
curity?  Are  we  talking  about  electronic  commerce,  are  we  talking 
about consumer privacy? 

Mr. SCHWARTZ. As I said in my testimony, we think that the pri-
vacy  issue—I  agree  with  what  Mr.  Hughes  said—that  the  privacy 
issue  is  a  separate  issue.  We  need  to  deal  with  the  general  online 
privacy debate and get at some of these issues before they happen. 
We  need  to  have  that  issue  in  a  separate  discussion.  That  said, 
there are things that we can do today, and enforcement of existing 
law  is  a  key  to  it,  I  think,  improving  some  of  the  standards  that 
we  have,  seeing  a  better  framework  that  pushes  for  improved  en-
forcement and building incentives for positive action, are really the 
key  points,  going  after  behaviors  instead  of  specific  technologies  is 
a  key  point  here.  Those  are  things  that  we  can  do  in  spyware-spe-
cific legislation, but we need to have other issues debated, we need 
to  have  oversight  of  some  of  these  law  enforcement  agencies,  and 
seeing  what  they’re  doing  today,  let’s  have  a  discussion  with  them 
about how they’re using their resources and what we can do to help 
them  use  their  resources  and  help  them  bring  some  of  these  cases 
to light, as Mr. Hughes said. 

Senator BURNS. What about consumer education? 
Mr.  SCHWARTZ.  Consumer  education  is  an  important  piece  of 
this. The problem is the debate changes very quickly. This is some-
where  where  anti-spyware  technologies  are  extremely  important, 
and  we  need  to  start  doing  a  better  job  of  educating  consumers 
about security and including anti-spyware technologies in that dis-
cussion.  We  are  working  with  the  anti-spyware  technology  compa-
nies to try and build a discussion so that we can talk to consumers 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

in  a  cohesive  way  with  some  of  the  anti-spyware  companies  and 
with  some  of  the  consumer  groups.  We  are  just  at  the  beginning 
of that discussion, but we hope to have a product by the end of the 
summer. 

Mr.  MOLL.  Senator,  if  I  may  add  one  comment  to  that.  I  fear 
there  is  a  sense  that  there’s  a  silver  bullet  out  there.  We  don’t  be-
lieve  that  the  silver  bullet  is  legislation.  We  don’t  believe  it’s  en-
forcement,  and  we  don’t  believe  it’s  technology—particularly  as  it 
relates  to  things  like  new  operating  systems  or  new  browser  capa-
bilities.  Only  this  last  week,  some  of  what  we  considered  to  be  the 
better  browsers,  and  the  more  defensible  operating  systems  have 
proven to be compromised by the likes of spyware. 

What  we  believe  is  that  a  layered  approach  is  important.  That 
education,  legislation,  enforcement  and  technology  need  to  work  in 
concert,  and  I  believe  there’s  a  good  example  now  that,  frankly  is 
close  to  20  years  old  in  the  antivirus  marketplace.  This  reflects 
where  laws  have  been  in  place,  and  where  education  to  this  point 
has  been  effective.  You  know,  the  market  is  fully  penetrated  by 
antivirus products, and that market in concert with these activities 
have  worked  well  together  to  thwart  what  was  once  a  damning 
problem,  to  make  it  now  effectively  neutralized.  I  think  that’s  a 
good  template  for  us  to  consider  as  we  deal  with  this  problem  as 
well. 

Senator  BURNS.  If  the  Senator  would  yield,  I  would  like  to  add 
a  footnote  on  that.  When  you  come  to  awareness  and  public  edu-
cation  on  this  problem,  I  would  have  to  get  a  hold  of  some  of  Mr. 
Hughes’  folks  because  it’s  going  to  take  a  pretty  good  word  me-
chanic  to  get  all  the  awareness  and  using  terms  that  are  com-
pletely  strange  and  foreign  to  the  majority  of  people,  even  us  who 
use computers, into a 30 second spot, so to speak. But, nonetheless, 
I  think  some  people  with  some  cartoon  ability  and  creativity  can 
do  that,  and  I  know  the  National  Ad  Council  would  take  a  look  at 
that, because it becomes, it’s a very serious thing and public aware-
ness is going to be key on this thing. We know that. 

Senator Snowe, thank you for joining us this morning. We wrote 

you down as tardy. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, thank you. Well, let’s 

just say I’m not alone in that regard. 

[Laughter.] 

STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for holding this hear-
ing  today.  I  do  appreciate  it,  and  also  for  your  leadership  that  you 
have  given  consistently  over  time  on  this  issue  and  on  the  anti- 
spam legislation a few years ago. 

I want to welcome the panelists, and Mr. Hughes, I know you’re 
from  York,  Maine,  beautiful.  It’s  great  to  have  you  here.  What  is 
it?  Spyware  is  a  very  insidious  practice.  You  know,  it’s  obviously 
something  that’s  going  to  have  to  be  addressed  through  Federal 
legislation in some form. Obviously we don’t want to create any un-
intended consequences as a result of any legislative efforts and the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

question  is  how  far  we  go.  It’s  gotten  beyond  us  in  terms  of  the 
magnitude of the problem. 

Mr.  Hughes,  I  know  you  spoke  of  the  fact  that  you  think  we 
should concentrate on fraud and deception. But what is wrong with 
making  it  comparable  to  the  ‘‘do  not  call’’  list  and  getting  the  con-
sent of the user before this programming can be imbedded? 

Mr.  HUGHES.  So,  before  you  get  to  that  analysis  you  need  to 
make  a  decision  about  what  you  are  pulling  within  scope.  I  think 
the NAI would strongly support transparency and accountability in 
download processes. The practices of drive-by downloads are simply 
wrong  and  need  to  be  stopped.  And  for  any  download  onto  your 
computer  there  should  be  some  standards  of  notice  and  choice  and 
transparency associated with that coming onto your system. 

But in defining that, in H.R. 29 in the House of Representatives, 
it’s  done  under  the  definition  of  computer  software.  What  we  find 
is that defining it narrowly enough is a real challenge, a real chal-
lenge.  I  think  it  has  been  the  biggest  flaw  that  I  have  seen  in 
spyware  legislation  to  date.  We  cannot  find  a  definition  that  is 
tight enough to focus only on the acute problem of spyware without 
creating unintended consequences. 

So,  I  think  we  need  to  step  back  from  the  technology  and  have 
a  behavioral  approach.  Focus  on  the  behaviors  that  sit  behind  the 
technology.  Those  purveying  spyware  are  simply  going  to  move 
onto  another  technology  if  we  eliminate  their  ability  to  use  some 
method of software today. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Is  it  because  you  have  to  make  it  technology- 

specific in the definition, or are you—— 

Mr. HUGHES. We have seen that in some software. 
Senator  SNOWE.  I  just  know  that  some  of  the  anti-spyware  pro-
grams,  for  example,  haven’t  even  had  the  capability  to  keep  up 
with the kind of spyware that’s being developed. So, if that’s prob-
lematic,  how  is  the  individual  consumer  going  to  keep  up?  That’s 
the  issue  here.  I  am  just  afraid  that  this  problem  has  gotten  so 
great that if we don’t take an aggressive approach in attacking this 
problem,  it  will  get  out  of  the  hand  and  it  will  be  virtually  impos-
sible. 

I don’t know if the legislation can ultimately define or capture all 
of  the  technology.  I  understand  that,  we  authorized  the  Tele-
communications  Act  in  1996,  and  no  one  could  foresee  to  what  ex-
tent  it  would  be  outdated  because  of  the  advent  of  so  many  dif-
ferent  forms  of  technology,  including  wireless,  in  that  process.  But 
on  the  other  hand,  I  don’t  see  how  you  are  going  to  get  a  hold  of 
this  problem  through  fraud  and  deception  alone.  I  just  wonder  if 
it’s going to be aggressive enough, or if there are enough resources 
that  can  be  applied  to  the  states  and  to  the  FTC  to  do  what  it 
needs to do to get at those who are purveying this kind of program-
ming. 

Mr. HUGHES. Senator, let me respond in two ways. First, I would 
concur fully with Mr. Moll in his description of a layered approach. 
We’d  call  it  a  holistic  approach.  We  think  that  the  response  to 
spyware  needs  to  have  a  number  of  components,  legislation  is 
clearly a component, but I think the legislative component is really 
more  tied  to  the  deterrent  effect  of  enforcement,  rather  than  the 
legislation itself. We also need a technology as a response. We also 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

need  consumer  education.  I  think  the  one  thing  missing  from  Mr. 
Moll’s  list  is  we  also  need  industry  best  practices  and  self-regula-
tion.  In  fact,  those  four  things  are  the  four  major  panels  at  this 
event  that  we’re  holding  tomorrow.  We  are  going  to  be  examining 
all of those. I think we need to respond to all of those things. 

The  second  response  I  would  like  to  give  you  is  that  during  the 
canned  spam  debate,  the  biggest  area  of  contention  was  whether 
we  go  with  an  opt-in  versus  an  opt-out  standard.  There  was  an 
enormous amount of media around that single issue. Do we require 
consent before you send a message or do we require you to include 
an  opt-out  in  each  message,  so  that  if  a  consumer  doesn’t  want  to 
receive the next one they can say no. At the end of the day I think 
what we found was that substantive standard was really irrelevant 
to  spammers,  because  regardless  of  what  standard  was  created, 
they were going to go on and spam. 

I  think  the  same  situation  exists  today  with  the  spyware  prob-
lem.  We  should  focus  on  the  behavior  of  spyware  and  the  details 
around  those  sort  of  fine-tuning  substantive  provisions,  that  we 
should  be  very  careful  to  protect  legitimate  uses  of  technology  in 
that industry. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Mr.  Moll  and  Mr.  Schwartz,  do  you  think  that 

we can conquer this problem effectively in that regard? 

Mr. MOLL. Well, Senator, I think that you are correct in your be-
lief that this is a problem that has gotten very far out of the tube, 
and  I  don’t  see  much  hope  of  us  getting  it  back  in.  I  believe  that, 
as you state, there needs to be an aggressive approach as a result. 
One  of  the  things  that  I  included  in  my  remarks  is  that  we  are 
really  dealing  with  an  organized  threat,  and  in  many  ways  it 
means  that  the  innovation  on  the  part  of  spyware  today  is  com-
pounded,  because  you  have  these  guys  working  together  in  new 
ways. They create more stuff, more frequently, and it’s much more 
innovative. I think that to try and be light-handed so, we don’t ruf-
fle the feathers of advertisers, will have an ill-effect in this regard. 
I think these guys are going to continue to go forward and find the 
edge of the law very quickly. 

Mr.  SCHWARTZ.  Senator,  I  agree  that  transparency  is  an  impor-
tant value, and we do need to get to the point of notice and consent 
for  software  as  it’s  delivered,  and  industry  best  practices  is  a  good 
way of going about and doing that. We need to start talking about 
how we are going to put some of these standards in law, especially 
in regards to software that collects personally identifiable informa-
tion. However, we do have the concern that there are some compa-
nies that are breaking existing law as it stands today, and how do 
we  go  about  enforcing  these  new  laws  that  we  are  going  to  put  on 
if we can’t enforce today’s laws. 

So, as we start to talk about what we are going to add onto this, 
we  need  to  keep  in  mind  how  we’re  going  to  do  enforcement  down 
the road. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  BURNS.  We’ve  got  a  vote  coming  up  at  11:30,  so  I  am 
going  to  try  to  ask  a  couple  questions  here,  and  then  we  will  end 
this part of the hearing. 

I  was  just  wondering,  as  we  look  at  this,  Mr.  Hughes,  can  you 
tell  me  about  the  various  adware  models  that  there  are  out  there 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

now,  in  particular,  what  kind  of  user  consent  or  notice  should  be 
given, specifically for downloads of private computers in support of 
adware. 

Give  us  an  idea—what’s  on  the  market  out  there,  and  Mr.  Moll, 
you  would  also  be  a  part  of  that,  too,  that’s  being  used  now  and 
is it effective? 

Mr.  HUGHES.  So  we  do  not  have,  yet,  in  the  adware  industry,  I 
think,  a  clearly  defined  set  of  best  practices,  but  most  definitely, 
concepts of fair information practices with notice and choice, where 
it  is  clear  what  is  being  downloaded,  and  how  it  is  being 
downloaded, and what it’s going to do once it’s downloaded, and the 
opportunity  for  a  consumer  to  consent  to  that  practice—I  think 
those  are  a  absolutely  necessary  components  for  any  business  that 
is in any way interested in engaging in that. 

In  addition,  I  think  an  incredibly  important  component  is  the 
ability  to  get  rid  of  it,  as  well.  You  need  to  have  the  ability  to 
uninstall whatever you have downloaded in a way that is complete 
and  thorough,  and  in  a  way  so  that  it  doesn’t  pop  back  up  again. 
So,  we  would  encourage  standards  like  that,  and  I  think  it  is  one 
of  the  topics  we  will  be  discussing  at  length  tomorrow.  It’s  an  im-
portant tool for us, I think, in defining what are appropriate stand-
ards for the adware industry. 

Senator  BURNS.  Maybe  tomorrow  I  should  go  to  New  York  and 

be that little fly on the wall and take notes. 
Mr. HUGHES. We would love to have you. 
Senator BURNS. Mr. Moll? 
Mr.  MOLL.  Senator,  I  think  that  today  it’s  all  over  the  map.  We 
have some interesting examples that we uncovered in the last week 
where,  once  presented  with  the  option  and  notification  of  installa-
tion  of  adware,  you  actually  cannot  click  no.  The  only  way  to  pro-
ceed without a hard reboot of your computer, is to click yes. That’s 
a  practice  that  we  think  is  typical  of  the  kinds  of  trickery  used  by 
adware, and by spyware more broadly. 

I think it’s important to look at that within the context, of three 
vectors  of  innovation  we  see  right  now  coming  into  the  industry. 
One  of  those  is  the  means  by  which  adware  and  spyware  gain  ac-
cess to your computer. The second is the means by which they com-
municate—how  silently  they  can  operate,  and  the  third  is  the 
means  by  which  they  perpetrate  themselves.  How  deeply  they  can 
move  on  your  system,  and  how  hard  they  can  be  to  find  and  re-
move.  And  I  think  that  all  three  of  these  are  elements  that  need 
to be addressed as we certainly think about best practices. 

Mr.  BURNS.  I  don’t  want  to  leave  Mr.  Schwartz  out  of  this  be-
cause I can see he has a comment here. There’s been mention that 
spyware companies have posed as anti-spyware companies. Do you 
publish  or  does  the  industry  have  a  list  of  the  good  actors  or  bad 
actors, is there a sort of a Better Business Bureau among your in-
dustry that people can consult? 

Mr.  MOLL.  Senator,  this  is  a  great  point.  There  exists  one  list 
today  that’s  widely  viewable,  it’s  spywarewarrior.com.  I  think  it’s 
a good list, it’s not well enough publicized or published. But beyond 
those  who  masquerade  to  be  anti-spyware,  while  they,  in  fact,  are 
spyware,  a  growing  list  of  the  anti-spyware  companies  are  using 
the  very  adware  networks  to  market  themselves.  And  I  find  both 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

of  these  cases  to  be  incredibly  offensive,  and  a  great  step  back  for 
the technical solutions providers that are legitimate, like ourselves. 

Senator BURNS. Mr. Schwartz? 
Mr.  SCHWARTZ.  I  agree  with  that  last  comment  that  it  is  a  con-
cern.  We  suggest  to  consumers  that  they  read  some  of  the  more 
mainstream magazines about anti-spyware software. Consumer Re-
ports  has  done  some  studies  about  anti-spyware  software,  CNET, 
Download.com, et cetera, have some ratings on it, so that’s probably 
a  consumer’s  best  resource  today,  using  a  third  party,  reliable 
source to go to if you’re interested in finding out more. Going back 
to  your  comment  about  industry,  I  would  agree  with  Mr.  Hughes, 
I’m  looking  forward  to  the  discussion  tomorrow  as  well,  and  we 
hope  that  it’s  the  start  of  building  a  relationship  with  some  of  the 
adware  companies  and  the  networks  who  are  all  intertwined  in 
some of this discussion. 

One  of  the  problems  that  we’re  seeing  today,  though,  is  that  a 
lot of the companies are using illegitimate practices to gain a foot-
hold into people’s computers, so we have a base of 20 million or 50 
million  or  90  million  computers,  and  then  at  that  point  they  say, 
‘‘We’re going to change our practices now, so you shouldn’t do any-
thing about us,’’ after they’re already on these 50 million or 90 mil-
lion  computers.  That’s  just  not  right.  We  do  have  to  look  at  what 
some  of  these  companies  have  done  in  the  past  and  go  back  and 
see what we can do about it today. 

Senator  BURNS.  And  there’s  some  economic  value  there,  also,  it 
becomes  pretty  expensive  trying  to  stay  ahead  of  the  bad  guys,  or 
react to the bad guys. 

Mr.  MOLL.  Senator  that  is  a  great  point.  Webroot  software  was 
only 20 people a year and a half ago, today we are fully 250 profes-
sionals, dealing solely with this problem. 

Senator  BURNS.  That  concerns  me  more  than  anything  else,  and 
then  when  we  start  adding  legislation  to  this,  it  makes  it  even 
more complicated, and so we will have more questions as we move 
along.  Congratulations  on  your  group  tomorrow,  I  think  whenever 
you  pull  the  industry  together  and  understand  the  problem,  and  I 
know  that  you  all  do,  and  when  industry  takes  a  positive  step  on 
what we can do in the name of the consumer, because I know most 
of  you  say,  ‘‘If  we  don’t  have  consumers,  we  don’t  have  jobs,’’  and 
so  we  take  our  job  of  policing,  and  the  more  we  know  about  it,  it 
is even more serious. 

I  thank  you  for  your  testimony  today.  We  will  be  in  touch  with 
all  of  you  as  we  move  this  legislation.  As  you  know,  I  approach 
these kinds of things as, do no harm, number one, and when you’ve 
got  an  additional  farmer  up  here  trying  to  deal  with  this,  we  can 
do  harm  and  have  some  unintentional  consequences  that  we  don’t 
want to have, to be right honest with you. So, I appreciate your tes-
timony here today, and I appreciate your cooperation working with 
us, because I think it’s time. I think it has implications that go way 
beyond just a commercial standpoint. We’re dealing with something 
here the way people communicate and do it through my computer, 
in my house, that I never know anything about it. And it’s bad peo-
ple  doing  bad  things  to  good  people.  And  I’m  very,  very  much  con-
cerned about that. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

We’re going to leave the record open for a couple of weeks, if any-
body  wants  to  make  any  other  comments,  any  other  Senators  that 
want to send you questions, we would hope that you would respond 
to  them  and  the  Committee,  and  I  thank  you  very  much  for  your 
testimony here today, we stand in recess. 

Hearing adjourned. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Today’s  hearing  before  the  Senate  Commerce  Committee  focuses  attention  on  an 
important, and increasingly aggressive, threat to the privacy and security of the av-
erage  American’s  computer.  Specifically,  today  we  examine  the  world  of  ‘‘spyware.’’ 
Spyware is an invasive computer software that can harvest sensitive, personal in-
formation,  and  can  compromise  the  security  of  computer  systems.  In  many  cases, 
spyware is installed without the user’s knowledge or consent, and even if discovered, 
it is removed in most instances only with great difficulty. 

In  some  cases,  spyware  is  merely  annoying,  forcing  users  to  close  unwanted  pop- 
up ads. In other cases, however, spyware can be downloaded without a user’s knowl-
edge  and  used  to  collect  personal  data  stored  on  a  computer  or  to  track  an  individ-
ual’s web surfing habits. 

The  most  insidious  spyware  programs  are  capable  of  recording  a  computer  user’s 
keyboard  strokes  to  steal  bank  account  numbers,  login  names,  and  personal  pass-
words.  This  form  of  spyware  can  also  make  computers  more  vulnerable  to  viruses 
and other security breaches. 

It  is  important  that  this  committee  consider  steps  that  can  be  taken  to  protect 
consumers  from  spyware.  For  example,  enforcing  clear  notice  and  consent  require-
ments could minimize potential abuses without interfering with the creation of new 
and innovative technologies. 

I look forward to working with my colleagues to address these difficult issues. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

C. DAVID MOLL 

Question  1.  You  argued  that  the  End  User  License  Agreement  is  a  major  part  of 
the problem in the informed consent debate. What recommendations would you sug-
gest to improve the EULA that will help consumers make more informed decisions? 
Answer.  When  considering  a  computer  user’s  ability  to  make  informed  decisions 
about what programs they load onto their systems, there are many challenges posed 
by  End  User  License  Agreements  (EULAs).  There  are  ongoing  efforts  led  by  indus-
try and academia to continue to refine the process of buying software online. Many 
companies, including Webroot, conduct usability testing to determine what language 
and format can be most conducive to users’ willingness and ability to review the in-
formation presented to them as part of their purchase experience. 

However,  in  spite  of  these  efforts,  there  is  a  wide  range  of  EULA  formats  and 
some  EULAs  do  not  clearly  convey  the  user’s  authorizations  and  obligations  with 
regard  to  the  software.  Some  EULAs  may  not  be  readily  discernable  due  to  for-
matting  problems  that  lead  to  confusion  about  the  licensing  terms  and  conditions. 
For  example,  some  EULAs  may  be  excessively  long,  difficult  to  locate,  or  difficult 
to  read  due  to  the  font  selected.  We  see  companies  taking  advantage  of  this  reality 
to  gain  the  user’s  ‘‘consent,’’  and  then  justify  the  download  of  the  software  and/or 
use of the user’s computer resources by that software. 

Ultimately, we want EULAs to be presented in clear, concise language that draws 
immediate  attention  to  the  terms  and  conditions  governing  the  use  of  the  software 
and highlights the user’s authorizations and obligations with regard to the software. 
Question  2.  Enforcement  is  key  in  resolving  the  spyware  issue.  The  anonymous 
nature  of  the  Internet  makes  it  difficult  to  track  down  the  bad  actors.  Many  argue 
that bad actors will not respect legislation. These skeptics believe that industry self- 
regulation  is  the  preferable  route  to  take.  If  Congress  were  to  allow  the  industry 
to  self  regulate,  how  would  you  go  about  enforcing  standards  that  the  industry  de-
velops? If a bad actor is not going to abide by Federal legislation, how can industry 
do better? 

Answer.  We  agree  that  there  will  be  cases  which  are  very  difficult  to  catch  in  a 
legal  net,  especially  those  cases  involving  companies  that  are  based  in  countries 

(41) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

lacking  our  same  legal  standards.  The  take  down  of  what  was  called  the 
‘‘ShadowCrew,’’  which  was  the  topic  of  the  May  30  Business  Week  cover  story  is  a 
good example of international law enforcement and industry cooperation. 

While we are seeing many instances of spyware emanating from countries outside 
the U.S., spyware purveyors are not solely outside the U.S.; nor are they all obvious 
criminals. When we assembled the list of top threats in our State of Spyware report, 
we  found  that  most  of  the  prevalent  offenders  are  U.S.  based  companies.  Enforce-
ment actions like the one that the FTC brought against Seismic, help to clarify how 
current laws should be interpreted and applied to the spyware problem but may also 
be viewed as case specific. 

New  legislation  will  even  further  clarify  the  FTC’s  role  in  protecting  consumers 
as  well  as  the  application  of  the  FTC  Act  when  it  comes  to  the  purveyance  of 
spyware.  Moreover,  new  legislation  will  send  a  strong  message  to  people  in  the 
spyware  business  or  funding  companies  that  engage  in  bad  practices  that  they’re 
walking on the wrong side of the law. However, as I stated in my testimony on May 
11,  2005,  legislation  by  itself,  will  not  remedy  the  problem.  Any  legislation  that  is 
enacted must also work in tandem with industry best practices as well as consumer 
education. 

Question  3.  A  recent  Los  Angeles  Times  article  detailed  how  major  companies, 
such  as  Mercedes-Benz,  Disney,  and  Dell,  have  inadvertently  or  unknowingly  used 
adware  programs  in  their  ad  campaigns.  Companies  purchase  advertising  from  a 
provider, which then contracts out to additional providers, some of which engage in 
adware  practices.  Is  there  a  way  to  address  the  demand  side  of  the  adware  equa-
tion? How do we get companies to stop using adware as an advertising channel? 

Answer.  This  is  the  area  where  industry  efforts  can  make  a  big  difference.  The 
companies you list, and many more like them, have a tremendous amount of brand 
equity to protect. The Center for Democracy and Technology and the FTC are work-
ing  to  find  ways  to  educate  large,  well-respected  companies  about  the  adware  food 
chain and outcome of their online advertising expenditures. We are very supportive 
of these efforts. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

ARI SCHWARTZ 

Question  1.  Enforcement  is  key  in  resolving  the  spyware  issue.  The  anonymous 
nature  of  the  Internet  makes  it  difficult  to  track  down  the  bad  actors.  Many  argue 
that bad actors will not respect legislation. These skeptics believe that industry self- 
regulation  is  the  preferable  route  to  take.  If  Congress  were  to  allow  the  industry 
to  self-regulate,  how  would  you  go  about  enforcing  standards  that  the  industry  de-
velops? If a bad actor is not going to abide by Federal legislation, how can industry 
do better? 

Answer. Industry-developed standards can be effectively enforced in two ways: 
• Advertisers  can  adopt  standards  as  prerequisites  for  partnering  relationships. 
Companies  like  Verizon,  Dell,  and  Major  League  Baseball  have  developed  poli-
cies  for  who  they  will  advertise  with.  If  industry-set  standards  serve  as  the 
basis  for  similar  policies  adopted  by  other  large  advertisers,  this  will  create 
strong pressure for adware vendors to abide by those standards. Advertisers are 
the true customers of adware vendors. They have a unique ability to change the 
behavior of the adware companies. 

• Anti-spyware  software  vendors  can  use  the  standards  as  a  basis  for  flagging  or 
blocking  programs.  As  anti-spyware  software  increasingly  becomes  a  standard 
part  of  computer  users  self-protection  regimen,  companies  that  do  not  abide  by 
the standards will find it difficult to attract and retain users. 

CDT  believes  industry  initiatives  thus  provide  a  valuable  supplement  to  strong 
enforcement of State and Federal laws. Private sector efforts can frustrate spyware 
vendors  where  traditional  law  enforcement  might  be  difficult  or  where  law  enforce-
ment  resources  are  limited.  They  also  allow  for  dynamic  response  to  attempts  by 
bad actors to create novel forms of spyware to skirt specific language in law. 

Question  2.  A  recent  Los  Angeles  Times  article  detailed  how  major  companies, 
such  as  Mercedes-Benz,  Disney,  and  Dell,  have  inadvertently  or  unknowingly  used 
adware  programs  in  their  ad  campaigns.  Companies  purchase  advertising  from  a 
provider, which then contracts out to additional providers, some of which engage in 
adware  practices.  Is  there  a  way  to  address  the  demand  side  of  the  adware  equa-
tion? How do we get companies to stop using adware as an advertising channel? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

Answer. The first step in addressing the demand side of the adware/spyware prob-
lem  is  to  make  large  companies  aware  that  their  advertising  dollars  may  be  sup-
porting adware and spyware purveyors. These companies need to be shown the neg-
ative  consequences  for  their  brands  of  being  associated  with  spyware  and  adware 
practices. 

Once  large  advertisers  understand  the  problem,  they  will  begin  to  demand  that 
the networks and other intermediaries they partner with allow greater control over 
ad placement and stronger guarantees about excluding bad actors. 

Spyware  companies  rely  on  business  structures  that  make  it  difficult  to  assign 
culpability  when  malicious  software  is  tied  into  ads.  However,  if  there  is  demand 
from  large  advertisers,  advertising  brokers  will  work  to  clean  up  these  opaque  net-
works and provide greater transparency. 

Over time, we believe improved transparency in the online advertising space and 
greater  awareness  of  the  adware  and  spyware  problems  will  help  stem  the  flow  of 
money to spyware companies. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:44 Nov 03, 2010 Jkt 061887 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61887.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

